English
" Nature, in the broadest sense, is the natural, physical, material world or universe."
"""Nature"" can refer to the phenomena of the physical world, and also to life in general."
"The study of nature is a large, if not the only, part of science."
"Although humans are part of nature, human activity is often understood as a separate category from other natural phenomena."
"[1] The word nature is borrowed from the Old French nature and is derived from the Latin word natura, or ""essential qualities, innate disposition"", and in ancient times, literally meant ""birth""."
"[2] In ancient philosophy, natura is mostly used as the Latin translation of the Greek word physis (φύσις), which originally related to the intrinsic characteristics that plants, animals, and other features of the world develop of their own accord."
"[3][4] 
The concept of nature as a whole, the physical universe, is one of several expansions of the original notion;[1] it began with certain core applications of the word φύσις by pre-Socratic philosophers (though this word had a dynamic dimension then, especially for Heraclitus), and has steadily gained currency ever since."
"During the advent of modern scientific method in the last several centuries, nature became the passive reality, organized and moved by divine laws."
"[5][6] With the Industrial revolution, nature increasingly became seen as the part of reality deprived from intentional intervention : it was hence considered as sacred by some traditions (Rousseau, American transcendentalism) or a mere decorum for divine providence or human history (Hegel, Marx)."
"However, a vitalist vision of nature, closer to the presocratic one, got reborn at the same time, especially after Charles Darwin."
"[1] Within the various uses of the word today, ""nature"" often refers to geology and wildlife."
"Nature can refer to the general realm of living plants and animals, and in some cases to the processes associated with inanimate objects—the way that particular types of things exist and change of their own accord, such as the weather and geology of the Earth."
"It is often taken to mean the ""natural environment"" or wilderness—wild animals, rocks, forest, and in general those things that have not been substantially altered by human intervention, or which persist despite human intervention."
"For example, manufactured objects and human interaction generally are not considered part of nature, unless qualified as, for example, ""human nature"" or ""the whole of nature""."
"This more traditional concept of natural things that can still be found today implies a distinction between the natural and the artificial, with the artificial being understood as that which has been brought into being by a human consciousness or a human mind."
"Depending on the particular context, the term ""natural"" might also be distinguished from the unnatural or the supernatural."
"[1] Earth is the only planet known to support life, and its natural features are the subject of many fields of scientific research."
"Within the solar system, it is third closest to the sun; it is the largest terrestrial planet and the fifth largest overall."
"Its most prominent climatic features are its two large polar regions, two relatively narrow temperate zones, and a wide equatorial tropical to subtropical region."
"[7] Precipitation varies widely with location, from several metres of water per year to less than a millimetre."
71 percent of the Earth's surface is covered by salt-water oceans.
"The remainder consists of continents and islands, with most of the inhabited land in the Northern Hemisphere."
Earth has evolved through geological and biological processes that have left traces of the original conditions.
The outer surface is divided into several gradually migrating tectonic plates.
"The interior remains active, with a thick layer of plastic mantle and an iron-filled core that generates a magnetic field."
"This iron core is composed of a solid inner phase, and a fluid outer phase."
"Convective motion in the core generates electric currents through dynamo action, and these, in turn, generate the geomagnetic field."
"The atmospheric conditions have been significantly altered from the original conditions by the presence of life-forms,[8] which create an ecological balance that stabilizes the surface conditions."
"Despite the wide regional variations in climate by latitude and other geographic factors, the long-term average global climate is quite stable during interglacial periods,[9] and variations of a degree or two of average global temperature have historically had major effects on the ecological balance, and on the actual geography of the Earth."
[10][11] Geology is the science and study of the solid and liquid matter that constitutes the earth.
"The field of geology encompasses the study of the composition, structure, physical properties, dynamics, and history of Earth materials, and the processes by which they are formed, moved, and changed."
"The field is a major academic discipline, and is also important for mineral and hydrocarbon extraction, knowledge about and mitigation of natural hazards, some Geotechnical engineering fields, and understanding past climates and environments."
The geology of an area evolves through time as rock units are deposited and inserted and deformational processes change their shapes and locations.
Rock units are first emplaced either by deposition onto the surface or intrude into the overlying rock.
"Deposition can occur when sediments settle onto the surface of the Earth and later lithify into sedimentary rock, or when as volcanic material such as volcanic ash or lava flows, blanket the surface."
"Igneous intrusions such as batholiths, laccoliths, dikes, and sills, push upwards into the overlying rock, and crystallize as they intrude."
"After the initial sequence of rocks has been deposited, the rock units can be deformed and/or metamorphosed."
"Deformation typically occurs as a result of horizontal shortening, horizontal extension, or side-to-side (strike-slip) motion."
"These structural regimes broadly relate to convergent boundaries, divergent boundaries, and transform boundaries, respectively, between tectonic plates."
"Earth is estimated to have formed 4.54 billion years ago from the solar nebula, along with the Sun and other planets."
[12] The moon formed roughly 20 million years later.
"Initially molten, the outer layer of the Earth cooled, resulting in the solid crust."
Outgassing and volcanic activity produced the primordial atmosphere.
"Condensing water vapor, most or all of which came from ice delivered by comets, produced the oceans and other water sources."
[13] The highly energetic chemistry is believed to have produced a self-replicating molecule around 4 billion years ago.
"[14] Continents formed, then broke up and reformed as the surface of Earth reshaped over hundreds of millions of years, occasionally combining to make a supercontinent."
"Roughly 750 million years ago, the earliest known supercontinent Rodinia, began to break apart."
"The continents later recombined to form Pannotia which broke apart about 540 million years ago, then finally Pangaea, which broke apart about 180 million years ago."
"[16] During the Neoproterozoic era, freezing temperatures covered much of the Earth in glaciers and ice sheets."
"This hypothesis has been termed the ""Snowball Earth"", and it is of particular interest as it precedes the Cambrian explosion in which multicellular life forms began to proliferate about 530–540 million years ago."
[17] Since the Cambrian explosion there have been five distinctly identifiable mass extinctions.
"[18] The last mass extinction occurred some 66 million years ago, when a meteorite collision probably triggered the extinction of the non-avian dinosaurs and other large reptiles, but spared small animals such as mammals."
"Over the past 66 million years, mammalian life diversified."
"[19] Several million years ago, a species of small African ape gained the ability to stand upright."
"[15] The subsequent advent of human life, and the development of agriculture and further civilization allowed humans to affect the Earth more rapidly than any previous life form, affecting both the nature and quantity of other organisms as well as global climate."
"By comparison, the Great Oxygenation Event, produced by the proliferation of algae during the Siderian period, required about 300 million years to culminate."
"The present era is classified as part of a mass extinction event, the Holocene extinction event, the fastest ever to have occurred."
"[20][21] Some, such as E. O. Wilson of Harvard University, predict that human destruction of the biosphere could cause the extinction of one-half of all species in the next 100 years."
"[22] The extent of the current extinction event is still being researched, debated and calculated by biologists."
[23][24][25] The Earth's atmosphere is a key factor in sustaining the ecosystem.
The thin layer of gases that envelops the Earth is held in place by gravity.
"Air is mostly nitrogen, oxygen, water vapor, with much smaller amounts of carbon dioxide, argon, etc."
The atmospheric pressure declines steadily with altitude.
The ozone layer plays an important role in depleting the amount of ultraviolet (UV) radiation that reaches the surface.
"As DNA is readily damaged by UV light, this serves to protect life at the surface."
"The atmosphere also retains heat during the night, thereby reducing the daily temperature extremes."
"Terrestrial weather occurs almost exclusively in the lower part of the atmosphere, and serves as a convective system for redistributing heat."
"[26] Ocean currents are another important factor in determining climate, particularly the major underwater thermohaline circulation which distributes heat energy from the equatorial oceans to the polar regions."
These currents help to moderate the differences in temperature between winter and summer in the temperate zones.
"Also, without the redistributions of heat energy by the ocean currents and atmosphere, the tropics would be much hotter, and the polar regions much colder."
Weather can have both beneficial and harmful effects.
"Extremes in weather, such as tornadoes or hurricanes and cyclones, can expend large amounts of energy along their paths, and produce devastation."
"Surface vegetation has evolved a dependence on the seasonal variation of the weather, and sudden changes lasting only a few years can have a dramatic effect, both on the vegetation and on the animals which depend on its growth for their food."
Climate is a measure of the long-term trends in the weather.
"Various factors are known to influence the climate, including ocean currents, surface albedo, greenhouse gases, variations in the solar luminosity, and changes to the Earth's orbit."
"Based on historical records, the Earth is known to have undergone drastic climate changes in the past, including ice ages."
"The climate of a region depends on a number of factors, especially latitude."
A latitudinal band of the surface with similar climatic attributes forms a climate region.
"There are a number of such regions, ranging from the tropical climate at the equator to the polar climate in the northern and southern extremes."
"Weather is also influenced by the seasons, which result from the Earth's axis being tilted relative to its orbital plane."
"Thus, at any given time during the summer or winter, one part of the Earth is more directly exposed to the rays of the sun."
This exposure alternates as the Earth revolves in its orbit.
"At any given time, regardless of season, the northern and southern hemispheres experience opposite seasons."
"Weather is a chaotic system that is readily modified by small changes to the environment, so accurate weather forecasting is limited to only a few days."
"[27] Overall, two things are happening worldwide: (1) temperature is increasing on the average; and (2) regional climates have been undergoing noticeable changes."
[28] Water is a chemical substance that is composed of hydrogen and oxygen (H2O) and is vital for all known forms of life.
"[29] In typical usage, water refers only to its liquid form or state, but the substance also has a solid state, ice, and a gaseous state, water vapor, or steam."
Water covers 71% of the Earth's surface.
"[30] On Earth, it is found mostly in oceans and other large bodies of water, with 1.6% of water below ground in aquifers and 0.001% in the air as vapor, clouds, and precipitation."
"[31][32] Oceans hold 97% of surface water, glaciers, and polar ice caps 2.4%, and other land surface water such as rivers, lakes, and ponds 0.6%."
"Additionally, a minute amount of the Earth's water is contained within biological bodies and manufactured products."
"An ocean is a major body of saline water, and a principal component of the hydrosphere."
"Approximately 71% of the Earth's surface (an area of some 361 million square kilometers) is covered by ocean, a continuous body of water that is customarily divided into several principal oceans and smaller seas."
"More than half of this area is over 3,000 meters (9,800 feet) deep."
"Average oceanic salinity is around 35 parts per thousand (ppt) (3.5%), and nearly all seawater has a salinity in the range of 30 to 38 ppt."
"Though generally recognized as several 'separate' oceans, these waters comprise one global, interconnected body of salt water often referred to as the World Ocean or global ocean."
[33][34] This concept of a global ocean as a continuous body of water with relatively free interchange among its parts is of fundamental importance to oceanography.
"[35] The major oceanic divisions are defined in part by the continents, various archipelagos, and other criteria: these divisions are (in descending order of size) the Pacific Ocean, the Atlantic Ocean, the Indian Ocean, the Southern Ocean, and the Arctic Ocean."
"Smaller regions of the oceans are called seas, gulfs, bays and other names."
"There are also salt lakes, which are smaller bodies of landlocked saltwater that are not interconnected with the World Ocean."
Two notable examples of salt lakes are the Aral Sea and the Great Salt Lake.
"A lake (from Latin word lacus) is a terrain feature (or physical feature), a body of liquid on the surface of a world that is localized to the bottom of basin (another type of landform or terrain feature; that is, it is not global) and moves slowly if it moves at all."
"On Earth, a body of water is considered a lake when it is inland, not part of the ocean, is larger and deeper than a pond, and is fed by a river."
"[36][37] The only world other than Earth known to harbor lakes is Titan, Saturn's largest moon, which has lakes of ethane, most likely mixed with methane."
"It is not known if Titan's lakes are fed by rivers, though Titan's surface is carved by numerous river beds."
"Natural lakes on Earth are generally found in mountainous areas, rift zones, and areas with ongoing or recent glaciation."
Other lakes are found in endorheic basins or along the courses of mature rivers.
"In some parts of the world, there are many lakes because of chaotic drainage patterns left over from the last Ice Age."
"All lakes are temporary over geologic time scales, as they will slowly fill in with sediments or spill out of the basin containing them."
"A pond is a body of standing water, either natural or man-made, that is usually smaller than a lake."
"A wide variety of man-made bodies of water are classified as ponds, including water gardens designed for aesthetic ornamentation, fish ponds designed for commercial fish breeding, and solar ponds designed to store thermal energy."
Ponds and lakes are distinguished from streams via current speed.
"While currents in streams are easily observed, ponds and lakes possess thermally driven micro-currents and moderate wind driven currents."
"These features distinguish a pond from many other aquatic terrain features, such as stream pools and tide pools."
"A river is a natural watercourse,[38] usually freshwater, flowing towards an ocean, a lake, a sea or another river."
"In a few cases, a river simply flows into the ground or dries up completely before reaching another body of water."
"Small rivers may also be called by several other names, including stream, creek, brook, rivulet, and rill; there is no general rule that defines what can be called a river."
Many names for small rivers are specific to geographic location; one example is Burn in Scotland and North-east England.
"Sometimes a river is said to be larger than a creek, but this is not always the case, due to vagueness in the language."
[39] A river is part of the hydrological cycle.
"Water within a river is generally collected from precipitation through surface runoff, groundwater recharge, springs, and the release of stored water in natural ice and snowpacks (i.e., from glaciers)."
"A stream is a flowing body of water with a current, confined within a bed and stream banks."
"In the United States, a stream is classified as a watercourse less than 60 feet (18 metres) wide."
"Streams are important as conduits in the water cycle, instruments in groundwater recharge, and they serve as corridors for fish and wildlife migration."
The biological habitat in the immediate vicinity of a stream is called a riparian zone.
"Given the status of the ongoing Holocene extinction, streams play an important corridor role in connecting fragmented habitats and thus in conserving biodiversity."
"The study of streams and waterways in general involves many branches of inter-disciplinary natural science and engineering, including hydrology, fluvial geomorphology, aquatic ecology, fish biology, riparian ecology, and others."
Ecosystems are composed of a variety of biotic and abiotic components that function in an interrelated way.
[41] The structure and composition is determined by various environmental factors that are interrelated.
Variations of these factors will initiate dynamic modifications to the ecosystem.
"Some of the more important components are soil, atmosphere, radiation from the sun, water, and living organisms."
Central to the ecosystem concept is the idea that living organisms interact with every other element in their local environment.
"Eugene Odum, a founder of ecology, stated: ""Any unit that includes all of the organisms (ie: the ""community"") in a given area interacting with the physical environment so that a flow of energy leads to clearly defined trophic structure, biotic diversity, and material cycles (i.e."
: exchange of materials between living and nonliving parts) within the system is an ecosystem.
"""[42] Within the ecosystem, species are connected and dependent upon one another in the food chain, and exchange energy and matter between themselves as well as with their environment."
"[43] The human ecosystem concept is based on the human/nature dichotomy and the idea that all species are ecologically dependent on each other, as well as with the abiotic constituents of their biotope."
[44] A smaller unit of size is called a microecosystem.
"For example, a microsystem can be a stone and all the life under it."
"A macroecosystem might involve a whole ecoregion, with its drainage basin."
[45] Wilderness is generally defined as areas that have not been significantly modified by human activity.
"Wilderness areas can be found in preserves, estates, farms, conservation preserves, ranches, national forests, national parks, and even in urban areas along rivers, gulches, or otherwise undeveloped areas."
"Wilderness areas and protected parks are considered important for the survival of certain species, ecological studies, conservation, and solitude."
"Some nature writers believe wilderness areas are vital for the human spirit and creativity,[46] and some ecologists consider wilderness areas to be an integral part of the Earth's self-sustaining natural ecosystem (the biosphere)."
"They may also preserve historic genetic traits and that they provide habitat for wild flora and fauna that may be difficult or impossible to recreate in zoos, arboretums, or laboratories."
"Although there is no universal agreement on the definition of life, scientists generally accept that the biological manifestation of life is characterized by organization, metabolism, growth, adaptation, response to stimuli, and reproduction."
[47] Life may also be said to be simply the characteristic state of organisms.
"Properties common to terrestrial organisms (plants, animals, fungi, protists, archaea, and bacteria) are that they are cellular, carbon-and-water-based with complex organization, having a metabolism, a capacity to grow, respond to stimuli, and reproduce."
An entity with these properties is generally considered life.
"However, not every definition of life considers all of these properties to be essential."
Human-made analogs of life may also be considered to be life.
"The biosphere is the part of Earth's outer shell—including land, surface rocks, water, air and the atmosphere—within which life occurs, and which biotic processes in turn alter or transform."
"From the broadest geophysiological point of view, the biosphere is the global ecological system integrating all living beings and their relationships, including their interaction with the elements of the lithosphere (rocks), hydrosphere (water), and atmosphere (air)."
"The entire Earth contains over 75 billion tons (150 trillion pounds or about 6.8×1013 kilograms) of biomass (life), which lives within various environments within the biosphere."
"[48] Over nine-tenths of the total biomass on Earth is plant life, on which animal life depends very heavily for its existence."
"[49] More than 2 million species of plant and animal life have been identified to date,[50] and estimates of the actual number of existing species range from several million to well over 50 million."
"[51][52][53] The number of individual species of life is constantly in some degree of flux, with new species appearing and others ceasing to exist on a continual basis."
[54][55] The total number of species is in rapid decline.
"[56][57][58] The origin of life on Earth is not well understood, but it is known to have occurred at least 3.5 billion years ago,[61][62][63] during the hadean or archean eons on a primordial Earth that had a substantially different environment than is found at present."
[64] These life forms possessed the basic traits of self-replication and inheritable traits.
"Once life had appeared, the process of evolution by natural selection resulted in the development of ever-more diverse life forms."
Species that were unable to adapt to the changing environment and competition from other life forms became extinct.
"However, the fossil record retains evidence of many of these older species."
Current fossil and DNA evidence shows that all existing species can trace a continual ancestry back to the first primitive life forms.
[64] When basic forms of plant life developed the process of photosynthesis the sun's energy could be harvested to create conditions which allowed for more complex life forms.
[65] The resultant oxygen accumulated in the atmosphere and gave rise to the ozone layer.
The incorporation of smaller cells within larger ones resulted in the development of yet more complex cells called eukaryotes.
"[66] Cells within colonies became increasingly specialized, resulting in true multicellular organisms."
"With the ozone layer absorbing harmful ultraviolet radiation, life colonized the surface of Earth."
"The first form of life to develop on the Earth were microbes, and they remained the only form of life until about a billion years ago when multi-cellular organisms began to appear."
"[67] Microorganisms are single-celled organisms that are generally microscopic, and smaller than the human eye can see."
"They include Bacteria, Fungi, Archaea, and Protista."
"These life forms are found in almost every location on the Earth where there is liquid water, including in the Earth's interior."
"[68]
Their reproduction is both rapid and profuse."
"The combination of a high mutation rate and a horizontal gene transfer[69] ability makes them highly adaptable, and able to survive in new environments, including outer space."
[70] They form an essential part of the planetary ecosystem.
"However, some microorganisms are pathogenic and can post health risk to other organisms."
"Originally Aristotle divided all living things between plants, which generally do not move fast enough for humans to notice, and animals."
"In Linnaeus' system, these became the kingdoms Vegetabilia (later Plantae) and Animalia."
"Since then, it has become clear that the Plantae as originally defined included several unrelated groups, and the fungi and several groups of algae were removed to new kingdoms."
"However, these are still often considered plants in many contexts."
"Bacterial life is sometimes included in flora,[71][72] and some classifications use the term bacterial flora separately from plant flora."
"Among the many ways of classifying plants are by regional floras, which, depending on the purpose of study, can also include fossil flora, remnants of plant life from a previous era."
"People in many regions and countries take great pride in their individual arrays of characteristic flora, which can vary widely across the globe due to differences in climate and terrain."
"Regional floras commonly are divided into categories such as native flora and agricultural and garden flora, the lastly mentioned of which are intentionally grown and cultivated."
"Some types of ""native flora"" actually have been introduced centuries ago by people migrating from one region or continent to another, and become an integral part of the native, or natural flora of the place to which they were introduced."
This is an example of how human interaction with nature can blur the boundary of what is considered nature.
Another category of plant has historically been carved out for weeds.
"Though the term has fallen into disfavor among botanists as a formal way to categorize ""useless"" plants, the informal use of the word ""weeds"" to describe those plants that are deemed worthy of elimination is illustrative of the general tendency of people and societies to seek to alter or shape the course of nature."
"Similarly, animals are often categorized in ways such as domestic, farm animals, wild animals, pests, etc."
according to their relationship to human life.
Animals as a category have several characteristics that generally set them apart from other living things.
"Animals are eukaryotic and usually multicellular (although see Myxozoa), which separates them from bacteria, archaea, and most protists."
"They are heterotrophic, generally digesting food in an internal chamber, which separates them from plants and algae."
"They are also distinguished from plants, algae, and fungi by lacking cell walls."
With a few exceptions—most notably the two phyla consisting of sponges and placozoans—animals have bodies that are differentiated into tissues.
"These include muscles, which are able to contract and control locomotion, and a nervous system, which sends and processes signals."
There is also typically an internal digestive chamber.
The eukaryotic cells possessed by all animals are surrounded by a characteristic extracellular matrix composed of collagen and elastic glycoproteins.
"This may be calcified to form structures like shells, bones, and spicules, a framework upon which cells can move about and be reorganized during development and maturation, and which supports the complex anatomy required for mobility."
"Although humans comprise only a minuscule proportion of the total living biomass on Earth, the human effect on nature is disproportionately large."
"Because of the extent of human influence, the boundaries between what humans regard as nature and ""made environments"" is not clear cut except at the extremes."
"Even at the extremes, the amount of natural environment that is free of discernible human influence is diminishing at an increasingly rapid pace."
The development of technology by the human race has allowed the greater exploitation of natural resources and has helped to alleviate some of the risk from natural hazards.
"In spite of this progress, however, the fate of human civilization remains closely linked to changes in the environment."
There exists a highly complex feedback loop between the use of advanced technology and changes to the environment that are only slowly becoming understood.
"[73] Man-made threats to the Earth's natural environment include pollution, deforestation, and disasters such as oil spills."
Humans have contributed to the extinction of many plants and animals.
Humans employ nature for both leisure and economic activities.
The acquisition of natural resources for industrial use remains a sizable component of the world's economic system.
"[74][75] Some activities, such as hunting and fishing, are used for both sustenance and leisure, often by different people."
Agriculture was first adopted around the 9th millennium BCE.
"Ranging from food production to energy, nature influences economic wealth."
"Although early humans gathered uncultivated plant materials for food and employed the medicinal properties of vegetation for healing,[76] most modern human use of plants is through agriculture."
"The clearance of large tracts of land for crop growth has led to a significant reduction in the amount available of forestation and wetlands, resulting in the loss of habitat for many plant and animal species as well as increased erosion."
"[77] Beauty in nature has historically been a prevalent theme in art and books, filling large sections of libraries and bookstores."
"That nature has been depicted and celebrated by so much art, photography, poetry, and other literature shows the strength with which many people associate nature and beauty."
"Reasons why this association exists, and what the association consists of, are studied by the branch of philosophy called aesthetics."
"Beyond certain basic characteristics that many philosophers agree about to explain what is seen as beautiful, the opinions are virtually endless."
[78] Nature and wildness have been important subjects in various eras of world history.
An early tradition of landscape art began in China during the Tang Dynasty (618–907).
The tradition of representing nature as it is became one of the aims of Chinese painting and was a significant influence in Asian art.
"Although natural wonders are celebrated in the Psalms and the Book of Job, wilderness portrayals in art became more prevalent in the 1800s, especially in the works of the Romantic movement."
British artists John Constable and J. M. W. Turner turned their attention to capturing the beauty of the natural world in their paintings.
"Before that, paintings had been primarily of religious scenes or of human beings."
"William Wordsworth's poetry described the wonder of the natural world, which had formerly been viewed as a threatening place."
Increasingly the valuing of nature became an aspect of Western culture.
[79] This artistic movement also coincided with the Transcendentalist movement in the Western world.
"A common classical idea of beautiful art involves the word mimesis, the imitation of nature."
Also in the realm of ideas about beauty in nature is that the perfect is implied through perfect mathematical forms and more generally by patterns in nature.
"As David Rothenburg writes, ""The beautiful is the root of science and the goal of art, the highest possibility that humanity can ever hope to see""."
"[80]:281 Some fields of science see nature as matter in motion, obeying certain laws of nature which science seeks to understand."
"For this reason the most fundamental science is generally understood to be ""physics""—the name for which is still recognizable as meaning that it is the ""study of nature""."
Matter is commonly defined as the substance of which physical objects are composed.
It constitutes the observable universe.
The visible components of the universe are now believed to compose only 4.9 percent of the total mass.
The remainder is believed to consist of 26.8 percent cold dark matter and 68.3 percent dark energy.
[81] The exact arrangement of these components is still unknown and is under intensive investigation by physicists.
The behaviour of matter and energy throughout the observable universe appears to follow well-defined physical laws.
These laws have been employed to produce cosmological models that successfully explain the structure and the evolution of the universe we can observe.
The mathematical expressions of the laws of physics employ a set of twenty physical constants[82] that appear to be static across the observable universe.
"[83] The values of these constants have been carefully measured, but the reason for their specific values remains a mystery."
"Outer space, also simply called space, refers to the relatively empty regions of the Universe outside the atmospheres of celestial bodies."
Outer space is used to distinguish it from airspace (and terrestrial locations).
"There is no discrete boundary between Earth's atmosphere and space, as the atmosphere gradually attenuates with increasing altitude."
"Outer space within the Solar System is called interplanetary space, which passes over into interstellar space at what is known as the heliopause."
"Outer space is sparsely filled with several dozen types of organic molecules discovered to date by microwave spectroscopy, blackbody radiation left over from the Big Bang and the origin of the universe, and cosmic rays, which include ionized atomic nuclei and various subatomic particles."
"There is also some gas, plasma and dust, and small meteors."
"Additionally, there are signs of human life in outer space today, such as material left over from previous manned and unmanned launches which are a potential hazard to spacecraft."
Some of this debris re-enters the atmosphere periodically.
"Although Earth is the only body within the solar system known to support life, evidence suggests that in the distant past the planet Mars possessed bodies of liquid water on the surface."
"[84] For a brief period in Mars' history, it may have also been capable of forming life."
"At present though, most of the water remaining on Mars is frozen."
"If life exists at all on Mars, it is most likely to be located underground where liquid water can still exist."
"[85] Conditions on the other terrestrial planets, Mercury and Venus, appear to be too harsh to support life as we know it."
"But it has been conjectured that Europa, the fourth-largest moon of Jupiter, may possess a sub-surface ocean of liquid water and could potentially host life."
"[86] Astronomers have started to discover extrasolar Earth analogs – planets that lie in the habitable zone of space surrounding a star, and therefore could possibly host life as we know it."
[87] Media: Organizations: Philosophy:   Wikipedia (/ˌwɪkɪˈpiːdiə/ (listen) wik-ih-PEE-dee-ə or /ˌwɪki-/ (listen) wik-ee-) is a multilingual open-collaborative online encyclopedia created and maintained by a community of volunteer editors using a wiki-based editing system.
"It is one of the 15 most popular websites as ranked by Alexa, as of January 2021[update][3] and The Economist newspaper placed it as the ""13th-most-visited place on the web""."
"[4] Featuring no advertisements, it is hosted by the Wikimedia Foundation, an American non-profit organization funded primarily through donations."
"Wikipedia was launched on January 15, 2001, by Jimmy Wales and Larry Sanger."
"Sanger coined its name[5][6] as a portmanteau of ""wiki"" and ""encyclopedia""."
"It was initially an English-language encyclopedia, but versions in other languages were quickly developed."
"With 6.2 million articles, the English Wikipedia is the largest of the 317 Wikipedia encyclopedias."
"Overall, Wikipedia comprises more than 55 million articles,[7] attracting 1.7 billion unique visitors per month."
"[8][9] Wikipedia has been criticized for its uneven accuracy and for exhibiting systemic bias, including gender bias, with the majority of editors being male."
[4] Edit-a-thons have been held to encourage female editors and increase the coverage of women's topics.
"[10] In 2006, Time magazine stated that the open-door policy of allowing anyone to edit had made Wikipedia the biggest and possibly the best encyclopedia in the world, and was a testament to the vision of Jimmy Wales."
"[11] The project's reputation improved further in the 2010s as it increased efforts to improve its quality and reliability, based on its unique structure, curation and absence of commercial bias."
"[4] In 2018, Facebook and YouTube announced that they would help users detect fake news by suggesting links to related Wikipedia articles."
"[12] Other collaborative online encyclopedias were attempted before Wikipedia, but none were as successful."
"[13] Wikipedia began as a complementary project for Nupedia, a free online English-language encyclopedia project whose articles were written by experts and reviewed under a formal process."
"[14] It was founded on March 9, 2000, under the ownership of Bomis, a web portal company."
"Its main figures were Bomis CEO Jimmy Wales and Larry Sanger, editor-in-chief for Nupedia and later Wikipedia."
"[15][16] Nupedia was initially licensed under its own Nupedia Open Content License, but even before Wikipedia was founded, Nupedia switched to the GNU Free Documentation License at the urging of Richard Stallman."
"[17] Wales is credited with defining the goal of making a publicly editable encyclopedia,[18][19] while Sanger is credited with the strategy of using a wiki to reach that goal."
"[20] On January 10, 2001, Sanger proposed on the Nupedia mailing list to create a wiki as a ""feeder"" project for Nupedia."
"[21] The domains wikipedia.com and wikipedia.org were registered on January 12, 2001,[22] and January 13, 2001,[23] respectively, and Wikipedia was launched on January 15, 2001,[14] as a single English-language edition at www.wikipedia.com,[24] and announced by Sanger on the Nupedia mailing list."
"[18] Wikipedia's policy of ""neutral point-of-view""[25] was codified in its first few months."
"Otherwise, there were relatively few rules initially and Wikipedia operated independently of Nupedia."
"[18] Originally, Bomis intended to make Wikipedia a business for profit."
"[26] Wikipedia gained early contributors from Nupedia, Slashdot postings, and web search engine indexing."
"Language editions were also created, with a total of 161 by the end of 2004."
"[27] Nupedia and Wikipedia coexisted until the former's servers were taken down permanently in 2003, and its text was incorporated into Wikipedia."
"The English Wikipedia passed the mark of two million articles on September 9, 2007, making it the largest encyclopedia ever assembled, surpassing the Yongle Encyclopedia made during the Ming Dynasty in 1408, which had held the record for almost 600 years."
"[28] Citing fears of commercial advertising and lack of control in Wikipedia, users of the Spanish Wikipedia forked from Wikipedia to create the Enciclopedia Libre in February 2002."
"[29] Wales then announced that Wikipedia would not display advertisements, and changed Wikipedia's domain from wikipedia.com to wikipedia.org."
"[30][31] Though the English Wikipedia reached three million articles in August 2009, the growth of the edition, in terms of the numbers of new articles and of contributors, appears to have peaked around early 2007."
"[32] Around 1,800 articles were added daily to the encyclopedia in 2006; by 2013 that average was roughly 800."
[33] A team at the Palo Alto Research Center attributed this slowing of growth to the project's increasing exclusivity and resistance to change.
"[34] Others suggest that the growth is flattening naturally because articles that could be called ""low-hanging fruit""—topics that clearly merit an article—have already been created and built up extensively."
"[35][36][37]  In November 2009, a researcher at the Rey Juan Carlos University in Madrid found that the English Wikipedia had lost 49,000 editors during the first three months of 2009; in comparison, the project lost only 4,900 editors during the same period in 2008."
[38][39] The Wall Street Journal cited the array of rules applied to editing and disputes related to such content among the reasons for this trend.
"[40] Wales disputed these claims in 2009, denying the decline and questioning the methodology of the study."
"[41] Two years later, in 2011, Wales acknowledged the presence of a slight decline, noting a decrease from ""a little more than 36,000 writers"" in June 2010 to 35,800 in June 2011."
"In the same interview, Wales also claimed the number of editors was ""stable and sustainable""."
"[42] A 2013 article titled ""The Decline of Wikipedia"" in MIT Technology Review questioned this claim."
"The article revealed that since 2007, Wikipedia had lost a third of its volunteer editors, and those still there have focused increasingly on minutiae."
"[43] In July 2012, The Atlantic reported that the number of administrators is also in decline."
"[44] In the November 25, 2013, issue of New York magazine, Katherine Ward stated ""Wikipedia, the sixth-most-used website, is facing an internal crisis""."
"[45] In January 2007, Wikipedia entered for the first time the top-ten list of the most popular websites in the US, according to comscore Networks."
"With 42.9 million unique visitors, Wikipedia was ranked number 9, surpassing The New York Times (#10) and Apple (#11)."
"This marked a significant increase over January 2006, when the rank was number 33, with Wikipedia receiving around 18.3 million unique visitors."
"[46] As of March 2020[update], Wikipedia has rank 13[3] among websites in terms of popularity according to Alexa Internet."
"In 2014, it received eight billion page views every month."
"[47] On February 9, 2014, The New York Times reported that Wikipedia has 18 billion page views and nearly 500 million unique visitors a month, ""according to the ratings firm comScore""."
"[8] Loveland and Reagle argue that, in process, Wikipedia follows a long tradition of historical encyclopedias that accumulated improvements piecemeal through ""stigmergic accumulation""."
"[48][49]  On January 18, 2012, the English Wikipedia participated in a series of coordinated protests against two proposed laws in the United States Congress—the Stop Online Piracy Act (SOPA) and the PROTECT IP Act (PIPA)—by blacking out its pages for 24 hours."
[50] More than 162 million people viewed the blackout explanation page that temporarily replaced Wikipedia content.
"[51][52] On January 20, 2014, Subodh Varma reporting for The Economic Times indicated that not only had Wikipedia's growth stalled, it ""had lost nearly ten percent of its page views last year."
There was a decline of about two billion between December 2012 and December 2013.
"Its most popular versions are leading the slide: page-views of the English Wikipedia declined by twelve percent, those of German version slid by 17 percent and the Japanese version lost nine percent."
"""[53] Varma added that ""While Wikipedia's managers think that this could be due to errors in counting, other experts feel that Google's Knowledge Graphs project launched last year may be gobbling up Wikipedia users."
"""[53] When contacted on this matter, Clay Shirky, associate professor at New York University and fellow at Harvard's Berkman Klein Center for Internet & Society indicated that he suspected much of the page view decline was due to Knowledge Graphs, stating, ""If you can get your question answered from the search page, you don't need to click [any further]."
"""[53] By the end of December 2016, Wikipedia was ranked fifth in the most popular websites globally."
"[54] In January 2013, 274301 Wikipedia, an asteroid, was named after Wikipedia; in October 2014, Wikipedia was honored with the Wikipedia Monument; and, in July 2015, 106 of the 7,473 700-page volumes of Wikipedia became available as Print Wikipedia."
"In April 2019, an Israeli lunar lander, Beresheet, crash landed on the surface of the Moon carrying a copy of nearly all of the English Wikipedia engraved on thin nickel plates; experts say the plates likely survived the crash."
"[55][56] In June 2019, scientists reported that all 16 GB of article text from the English Wikipedia have been encoded into synthetic DNA."
"[57] Unlike traditional encyclopedias, Wikipedia follows the procrastination principle[note 3] regarding the security of its content."
"[60] It started almost entirely open—anyone could create articles, and any Wikipedia article could be edited by any reader, even those who did not have a Wikipedia account."
Modifications to all articles would be published immediately.
"As a result, any article could contain inaccuracies such as errors, ideological biases, and nonsensical or irrelevant text."
"Due to the increasing popularity of Wikipedia, some editions, including the English version, have introduced editing restrictions for certain cases."
"For instance, on the English Wikipedia and some other language editions, only registered users may create a new article."
"[61] On the English Wikipedia, among others, particularly controversial, sensitive or vandalism-prone pages have been protected to varying degrees."
"[62][63] A frequently vandalized article can be semi-protected or extended confirmed protected, meaning that only autoconfirmed or extended confirmed editors are able to modify it."
[64] A particularly contentious article may be locked so that only administrators are able to make changes.
"[65] A 2021 article in the Columbia Journalism Review identified Wikipedia's page protection policies as ""[p]erhaps the most important"" means at Wikipedia's disposal to ""regulate its market of ideas""."
"[66] In certain cases, all editors are allowed to submit modifications, but review is required for some editors, depending on certain conditions."
"For example, the German Wikipedia maintains ""stable versions"" of articles,[67] which have passed certain reviews."
"Following protracted trials and community discussion, the English Wikipedia introduced the ""pending changes"" system in December 2012."
"[68] Under this system, new and unregistered users' edits to certain controversial or vandalism-prone articles are reviewed by established users before they are published."
"[69] Although changes are not systematically reviewed, the software that powers Wikipedia provides tools allowing anyone to review changes made by others."
"The ""History"" page of each article links to each revision."
"[note 4][70] On most articles, anyone can undo others' changes by clicking a link on the article's history page."
"Anyone can view the latest changes to articles, and anyone may maintain a ""watchlist"" of articles that interest them so they can be notified of any changes."
"""New pages patrol"" is a process whereby newly created articles are checked for obvious problems."
"[71] In 2003, economics Ph.D. student Andrea Ciffolilli argued that the low transaction costs of participating in a wiki create a catalyst for collaborative development, and that features such as allowing easy access to past versions of a page favor ""creative construction"" over ""creative destruction""."
[72] Any change or edit that manipulates content in a way that purposefully compromises the integrity of Wikipedia is considered vandalism.
The most common and obvious types of vandalism include additions of obscenities and crude humor.
Vandalism can also include advertising and other types of spam.
[73] Sometimes editors commit vandalism by removing content or entirely blanking a given page.
"Less common types of vandalism, such as the deliberate addition of plausible but false information to an article can be more difficult to detect."
"Vandals can introduce irrelevant formatting, modify page semantics such as the page's title or categorization, manipulate the underlying code of an article, or use images disruptively."
[74] Obvious vandalism is generally easy to remove from Wikipedia articles; the median time to detect and fix vandalism is a few minutes.
"[75][76] However, some vandalism takes much longer to repair."
"[77] In the Seigenthaler biography incident, an anonymous editor introduced false information into the biography of American political figure John Seigenthaler in May 2005."
Seigenthaler was falsely presented as a suspect in the assassination of John F.
Kennedy.
[77] The article remained uncorrected for four months.
"[77] Seigenthaler, the founding editorial director of USA Today and founder of the Freedom Forum First Amendment Center at Vanderbilt University, called Wikipedia co-founder Jimmy Wales and asked whether he had any way of knowing who contributed the misinformation."
"Wales replied that he did not, although the perpetrator was eventually traced."
"[78][79] After the incident, Seigenthaler described Wikipedia as ""a flawed and irresponsible research tool""."
"[77] This incident led to policy changes at Wikipedia, specifically targeted at tightening up the verifiability of biographical articles of living people."
"[80] In 2010, Daniel Tosh encouraged viewers of his show, Tosh.0, to visit the show's Wikipedia article and edit it at will."
"On a later episode, he commented on the edits to the article, most of them offensive, which had been made by the audience and had prompted the article to be locked from editing."
"[81][82] Wikipedians often have disputes regarding content, which may result in repeatedly making opposite changes to an article, known as ""edit warring""."
[83][84] The process is widely seen as a resource-consuming scenario where no useful knowledge is added.
"[85] This practice is also criticized as creating a competitive,[86] conflict based[87] editing culture associated with traditional masculine gender roles,[88] which contributes to the gender bias on Wikipedia."
Special interest groups have engaged in edit wars to advance their own political interests.
"Content in Wikipedia is subject to the laws (in particular, copyright laws) of the United States and of the US state of Virginia, where the majority of Wikipedia's servers are located."
"Beyond legal matters, the editorial principles of Wikipedia are embodied in the ""five pillars"" and in numerous policies and guidelines intended to appropriately shape content."
"Even these rules are stored in wiki form, and Wikipedia editors write and revise the website's policies and guidelines."
[89] Editors can enforce these rules by deleting or modifying non-compliant material.
"Originally, rules on the non-English editions of Wikipedia were based on a translation of the rules for the English Wikipedia."
They have since diverged to some extent.
"[67] According to the rules on the English Wikipedia, each entry in Wikipedia must be about a topic that is encyclopedic and is not a dictionary entry or dictionary-style."
"[90] A topic should also meet Wikipedia's standards of ""notability"",[91] which generally means that the topic must have been covered in mainstream media or major academic journal sources that are independent of the article's subject."
"Further, Wikipedia intends to convey only knowledge that is already established and recognized."
[92] It must not present original research.
A claim that is likely to be challenged requires a reference to a reliable source.
"Among Wikipedia editors, this is often phrased as ""verifiability, not truth"" to express the idea that the readers, not the encyclopedia, are ultimately responsible for checking the truthfulness of the articles and making their own interpretations."
"[93] This can at times lead to the removal of information that, though valid, is not properly sourced."
"[94] Finally, Wikipedia must not take sides."
"[95] All opinions and viewpoints, if attributable to external sources, must enjoy an appropriate share of coverage within an article."
This is known as a neutral point of view (NPOV).
Wikipedia's initial anarchy integrated democratic and hierarchical elements over time.
"[96][97] An article is not considered to be owned by its creator or any other editor, nor by the subject of the article."
"[98] Editors in good standing in the community can run for one of many levels of volunteer stewardship: this begins with ""administrator"",[99][100] privileged users who can delete pages, prevent articles from being changed in case of vandalism or editorial disputes (setting protective measures on articles), and try to prevent certain people from editing."
"Despite the name, administrators are not supposed to enjoy any special privilege in decision-making; instead, their powers are mostly limited to making edits that have project-wide effects and thus are disallowed to ordinary editors, and to implement restrictions intended to prevent certain persons from making disruptive edits (such as vandalism)."
"[101][102] Fewer editors become administrators than in years past, in part because the process of vetting potential Wikipedia administrators has become more rigorous."
[103] Bureaucrats name new administrators solely upon the recommendations from the community.
"Over time, Wikipedia has developed a semi-formal dispute resolution process to assist in such circumstances."
"To determine community consensus, editors can raise issues at appropriate community forums,[note 5] or seek outside input through third opinion requests or by initiating a more general community discussion known as a ""request for comment""."
The Arbitration Committee presides over the ultimate dispute resolution process.
"Although disputes usually arise from a disagreement between two opposing views on how an article should read, the Arbitration Committee explicitly refuses to directly rule on the specific view that should be adopted."
"Statistical analyses suggest that the committee ignores the content of disputes and rather focuses on the way disputes are conducted,[104] functioning not so much to resolve disputes and make peace between conflicting editors, but to weed out problematic editors while allowing potentially productive editors back in to participate."
"Therefore, the committee does not dictate the content of articles, although it sometimes condemns content changes when it deems the new content violates Wikipedia policies (for example, if the new content is considered biased)."
"Its remedies include cautions and probations (used in 63% of cases) and banning editors from articles (43%), subject matters (23%), or Wikipedia (16%)."
Complete bans from Wikipedia are generally limited to instances of impersonation and anti-social behavior.
"When conduct is not impersonation or anti-social, but rather anti-consensus or in violation of editing policies, remedies tend to be limited to warnings."
"[105] Each article and each user of Wikipedia has an associated ""Talk"" page."
"These form the primary communication channel for editors to discuss, coordinate and debate."
"[106] Wikipedia's community has been described as cultlike,[107] although not always with entirely negative connotations."
"[108] The project's preference for cohesiveness, even if it requires compromise that includes disregard of credentials, has been referred to as ""anti-elitism""."
[109] Wikipedians sometimes award one another virtual barnstars for good work.
"These personalized tokens of appreciation reveal a wide range of valued work extending far beyond simple editing to include social support, administrative actions, and types of articulation work."
[110] Wikipedia does not require that its editors and contributors provide identification.
"[111] As Wikipedia grew, ""Who writes Wikipedia?"""
became one of the questions frequently asked on the project.
"[112] Jimmy Wales once argued that only ""a community ... a dedicated group of a few hundred volunteers"" makes the bulk of contributions to Wikipedia and that the project is therefore ""much like any traditional organization""."
"[113] In 2008, a Slate magazine article reported that: ""According to researchers in Palo Alto, one percent of Wikipedia users are responsible for about half of the site's edits."
"""[114] This method of evaluating contributions was later disputed by Aaron Swartz, who noted that several articles he sampled had large portions of their content (measured by number of characters) contributed by users with low edit counts."
"[115] The English Wikipedia has 6,238,672 articles, 40,838,998 registered editors, and 141,020 active editors."
An editor is considered active if they have made one or more edits in the past 30 days.
"Editors who fail to comply with Wikipedia cultural rituals, such as signing talk page comments, may implicitly signal that they are Wikipedia outsiders, increasing the odds that Wikipedia insiders may target or discount their contributions."
"Becoming a Wikipedia insider involves non-trivial costs: the contributor is expected to learn Wikipedia-specific technological codes, submit to a sometimes convoluted dispute resolution process, and learn a ""baffling culture rich with in-jokes and insider references""."
"[116] Editors who do not log in are in some sense second-class citizens on Wikipedia,[116] as ""participants are accredited by members of the wiki community, who have a vested interest in preserving the quality of the work product, on the basis of their ongoing participation"",[117] but the contribution histories of anonymous unregistered editors recognized only by their IP addresses cannot be attributed to a particular editor with certainty."
"A 2007 study by researchers from Dartmouth College found that ""anonymous and infrequent contributors to Wikipedia [...] are as reliable a source of knowledge as those contributors who register with the site""."
"[118] Jimmy Wales stated in 2009 that ""[I]t turns out over 50% of all the edits are done by just .7% of the users ... 524 people ... And in fact, the most active 2%, which is 1400 people, have done 73.4% of all the edits."
"""[113] However, Business Insider editor and journalist Henry Blodget showed in 2009 that in a random sample of articles, most content in Wikipedia (measured by the amount of contributed text that survives to the latest sampled edit) is created by ""outsiders"", while most editing and formatting is done by ""insiders""."
"[113] A 2008 study found that Wikipedians were less agreeable, open, and conscientious than others,[119][120] although a later commentary pointed out serious flaws, including that the data showed higher openness and that the differences with the control group and the samples were small."
"[121] According to a 2009 study, there is ""evidence of growing resistance from the Wikipedia community to new content""."
[122] Several studies have shown that most of the Wikipedia contributors are male.
"Notably, the results of a Wikimedia Foundation survey in 2008 showed that only 13 percent of Wikipedia editors were female."
"[123] Because of this, universities throughout the United States tried to encourage females to become Wikipedia contributors."
"Similarly, many of these universities, including Yale and Brown, gave college credit to students who create or edit an article relating to women in science or technology."
"[124] Andrew Lih, a professor and scientist, wrote in The New York Times that the reason he thought the number of male contributors outnumbered the number of females so greatly was because identifying as a woman may expose oneself to ""ugly, intimidating behavior""."
[125] Data has shown that Africans are underrepresented among Wikipedia editors.
"[126] There are currently 317 language editions of Wikipedia (also called language versions, or simply Wikipedias)."
"As of January 2021, the six largest, in order of article count, are the English, Cebuano, Swedish, German, French, and Dutch Wikipedias."
"[127] The second and third largest Wikipedias owe their position to the article-creating bot Lsjbot, which as of 2013 had created about half the articles in the Swedish Wikipedia, and most of the articles in the Cebuano and Waray Wikipedias."
The latter are both languages of the Philippines.
"In addition to the top six, twelve other Wikipedias have more than a million articles each (Russian, Italian, Spanish, Polish, Waray, Vietnamese, Japanese, Egyptian Arabic, Chinese, Arabic, Ukrainian and Portuguese), seven more have over 500,000 articles (Persian, Catalan, Serbian, Indonesian, Norwegian (Bokmål), Korean and Finnish), 44 more have over 100,000, and 82 more have over 10,000."
"[128][129] The largest, the English Wikipedia, has over 6.2 million articles."
"As of January 2019[update], according to Alexa, the English subdomain (en.wikipedia.org; English Wikipedia) receives approximately 57% of Wikipedia's cumulative traffic, with the remaining split among the other languages (Russian: 9%; Chinese: 6%; Japanese: 6%; Spanish: 5%)."
"[3] Distribution of the 55,727,399 articles in different language editions (as of January 30, 2021)[130] The unit for the numbers in bars is articles."
"Since Wikipedia is based on the Web and therefore worldwide, contributors to the same language edition may use different dialects or may come from different countries (as is the case for the English edition)."
These differences may lead to some conflicts over spelling differences (e.g.
colour versus color)[132] or points of view.
"[133] Though the various language editions are held to global policies such as ""neutral point of view"", they diverge on some points of policy and practice, most notably on whether images that are not licensed freely may be used under a claim of fair use."
"[134][135][136] Jimmy Wales has described Wikipedia as ""an effort to create and distribute a free encyclopedia of the highest possible quality to every single person on the planet in their own language""."
"[137] Though each language edition functions more or less independently, some efforts are made to supervise them all."
"They are coordinated in part by Meta-Wiki, the Wikimedia Foundation's wiki devoted to maintaining all its projects (Wikipedia and others)."
"[138] For instance, Meta-Wiki provides important statistics on all language editions of Wikipedia,[139] and it maintains a list of articles every Wikipedia should have."
"[140] The list concerns basic content by subject: biography, history, geography, society, culture, science, technology, and mathematics."
It is not rare for articles strongly related to a particular language not to have counterparts in another edition.
"For example, articles about small towns in the United States might be available only in English, even when they meet the notability criteria of other language Wikipedia projects."
"Translated articles represent only a small portion of articles in most editions, in part because those editions do not allow fully automated translation of articles."
"[142] Articles available in more than one language may offer ""interwiki links"", which link to the counterpart articles in other editions."
A study published by PLOS One in 2012 also estimated the share of contributions to different editions of Wikipedia from different regions of the world.
"It reported that the proportion of the edits made from North America was 51% for the English Wikipedia, and 25% for the simple English Wikipedia."
"[141] On March 1, 2014, The Economist, in an article titled ""The Future of Wikipedia"", cited a trend analysis concerning data published by the Wikimedia Foundation stating that ""[t]he number of editors for the English-language version has fallen by a third in seven years."
"""[143] The attrition rate for active editors in English Wikipedia was cited by The Economist as substantially in contrast to statistics for Wikipedia in other languages (non-English Wikipedia)."
"The Economist reported that the number of contributors with an average of five or more edits per month was relatively constant since 2008 for Wikipedia in other languages at approximately 42,000 editors within narrow seasonal variances of about 2,000 editors up or down."
"The number of active editors in English Wikipedia, by sharp comparison, was cited as peaking in 2007 at approximately 50,000 and dropping to 30,000 by the start of 2014."
"Should this attrition have continued unabated at the quoted trend rate of approximately 20,000 editors lost within seven years, by 2021 there would be only 10,000 active editors on English Wikipedia."
"[143] In contrast, the trend analysis published in The Economist presents Wikipedia in other languages (non-English Wikipedia) as successful in retaining their active editors on a renewable and sustained basis, with their numbers remaining relatively constant at approximately 42,000."
[143] No comment was made concerning which of the differentiated edit policy standards from Wikipedia in other languages (non-English Wikipedia) would provide a possible alternative to English Wikipedia for effectively ameliorating substantial editor attrition rates on the English-language Wikipedia.
"[144] Various Wikipedians have criticized Wikipedia's large and growing regulation, which includes more than fifty policies and nearly 150,000 words as of 2014[update]."
[145][146] Critics have stated that Wikipedia exhibits systemic bias.
"In 2010, columnist and journalist Edwin Black described Wikipedia as being a mixture of ""truth, half-truth, and some falsehoods""."
"[147] Articles in The Chronicle of Higher Education and The Journal of Academic Librarianship have criticized Wikipedia's Undue Weight policy, concluding that the fact that Wikipedia explicitly is not designed to provide correct information about a subject, but rather focus on all the major viewpoints on the subject, give less attention to minor ones, and creates omissions that can lead to false beliefs based on incomplete information."
"[148][149][150] Journalists Oliver Kamm and Edwin Black alleged (in 2010 and 2011 respectively) that articles are dominated by the loudest and most persistent voices, usually by a group with an ""ax to grind"" on the topic."
"[147][151] A 2008 article in Education Next Journal concluded that as a resource about controversial topics, Wikipedia is subject to manipulation and spin."
"[152] In 2006, the Wikipedia Watch criticism website listed dozens of examples of plagiarism in the English Wikipedia."
"[153] Articles for traditional encyclopedias such as Encyclopædia Britannica are carefully and deliberately written by experts, lending such encyclopedias a reputation for accuracy."
"[154] However, a peer review in 2005 of forty-two scientific entries on both Wikipedia and Encyclopædia Britannica by the science journal Nature found few differences in accuracy, and concluded that ""the average science entry in Wikipedia contained around four inaccuracies; Britannica, about three."
"""[155] Joseph Reagle suggested that while the study reflects ""a topical strength of Wikipedia contributors"" in science articles, ""Wikipedia may not have fared so well using a random sampling of articles or on humanities subjects."
"""[156] Others raised similar critiques."
"[157] The findings by Nature were disputed by Encyclopædia Britannica,[158][159] and in response, Nature gave a rebuttal of the points raised by Britannica."
"[160] In addition to the point-for-point disagreement between these two parties, others have examined the sample size and selection method used in the Nature effort, and suggested a ""flawed study design"" (in Nature's manual selection of articles, in part or in whole, for comparison), absence of statistical analysis (e.g., of reported confidence intervals), and a lack of study ""statistical power"" (i.e., owing to small sample size, 42 or 4 × 101 articles compared, vs >105 and >106 set sizes for Britannica and the English Wikipedia, respectively)."
"[161] As a consequence of the open structure, Wikipedia ""makes no guarantee of validity"" of its content, since no one is ultimately responsible for any claims appearing in it."
"[162] Concerns have been raised by PC World in 2009 regarding the lack of accountability that results from users' anonymity,[163] the insertion of false information,[164] vandalism, and similar problems."
"Economist Tyler Cowen wrote: ""If I had to guess whether Wikipedia or the median refereed journal article on economics was more likely to be true after a not so long think I would opt for Wikipedia."""
"He comments that some traditional sources of non-fiction suffer from systemic biases and novel results, in his opinion, are over-reported in journal articles and relevant information is omitted from news reports."
"However, he also cautions that errors are frequently found on Internet sites and that academics and experts must be vigilant in correcting them."
[165] Critics argue that Wikipedia's open nature and a lack of proper sources for most of the information makes it unreliable.
"[166] Some commentators suggest that Wikipedia may be reliable, but that the reliability of any given article is not clear."
[167] Editors of traditional reference works such as the Encyclopædia Britannica have questioned the project's utility and status as an encyclopedia.
"[168] Wikipedia co-founder Jimmy Wales has claimed that Wikipedia has largely avoided the problem of ""fake news"" because the Wikipedia community regularly debates the quality of sources in articles."
"[169] Wikipedia's open structure inherently makes it an easy target for Internet trolls, spammers, and various forms of paid advocacy seen as counterproductive to the maintenance of a neutral and verifiable online encyclopedia."
"[70][171]
In response to paid advocacy editing and undisclosed editing issues, Wikipedia was reported in an article in The Wall Street Journal, to have strengthened its rules and laws against undisclosed editing."
"[172] The article stated that: ""Beginning Monday [from the date of the article, June 16, 2014], changes in Wikipedia's terms of use will require anyone paid to edit articles to disclose that arrangement."
"Katherine Maher, the nonprofit Wikimedia Foundation's chief communications officer, said the changes address a sentiment among volunteer editors that, 'we're not an advertising service; we're an encyclopedia."
"'""[172][173][174][175][176] These issues, among others, had been parodied since the first decade of Wikipedia, notably by Stephen Colbert on The Colbert Report."
"[177] A Harvard law textbook, Legal Research in a Nutshell (2011), cites Wikipedia as a ""general source"" that ""can be a real boon"" in ""coming up to speed in the law governing a situation"" and, ""while not authoritative, can provide basic facts as well as leads to more in-depth resources""."
"[178] Most university lecturers discourage students from citing any encyclopedia in academic work, preferring primary sources;[179] some specifically prohibit Wikipedia citations."
"[180][181] Wales stresses that encyclopedias of any type are not usually appropriate to use as citable sources, and should not be relied upon as authoritative."
[182] Wales once (2006 or earlier) said he receives about ten emails weekly from students saying they got failing grades on papers because they cited Wikipedia; he told the students they got what they deserved.
"""For God's sake, you're in college; don't cite the encyclopedia,"" he said."
"[183] In February 2007, an article in The Harvard Crimson newspaper reported that a few of the professors at Harvard University were including Wikipedia articles in their syllabi, although without realizing the articles might change."
"[184] In June 2007, former president of the American Library Association Michael Gorman condemned Wikipedia, along with Google,[185] stating that academics who endorse the use of Wikipedia are ""the intellectual equivalent of a dietitian who recommends a steady diet of Big Macs with everything""."
"In contrast, academic writing[clarification needed] in Wikipedia has evolved in recent years and has been found to increase student interest, personal connection to the product, creativity in material processing, and international collaboration in the learning process."
"[186] On March 5, 2014, Julie Beck writing for The Atlantic magazine in an article titled ""Doctors' #1 Source for Healthcare Information: Wikipedia"", stated that ""Fifty percent of physicians look up conditions on the (Wikipedia) site, and some are editing articles themselves to improve the quality of available information."
"""[187] Beck continued to detail in this article new programs of Amin Azzam at the University of San Francisco to offer medical school courses to medical students for learning to edit and improve Wikipedia articles on health-related issues, as well as internal quality control programs within Wikipedia organized by James Heilman to improve a group of 200 health-related articles of central medical importance up to Wikipedia's highest standard of articles using its Featured Article and Good Article peer-review evaluation process."
"[187] In a May 7, 2014, follow-up article in The Atlantic titled ""Can Wikipedia Ever Be a Definitive Medical Text?"
""", Julie Beck quotes WikiProject Medicine's James Heilman as stating: ""Just because a reference is peer-reviewed doesn't mean it's a high-quality reference."
"""[188] Beck added that: ""Wikipedia has its own peer review process before articles can be classified as 'good' or 'featured'."
"Heilman, who has participated in that process before, says 'less than one percent' of Wikipedia's medical articles have passed."
"""[188] In 2008, researchers at Carnegie Mellon University found that the quality of a Wikipedia article would suffer rather than gain from adding more writers when the article lacked appropriate explicit or implicit coordination."
"[189] For instance, when contributors rewrite small portions of an entry rather than making full-length revisions, high- and low-quality content may be intermingled within an entry."
"Roy Rosenzweig, a history professor, stated that American National Biography Online outperformed Wikipedia in terms of its ""clear and engaging prose"", which, he said, was an important aspect of good historical writing."
"[190] Contrasting Wikipedia's treatment of Abraham Lincoln to that of Civil War historian James McPherson in American National Biography Online, he said that both were essentially accurate and covered the major episodes in Lincoln's life, but praised ""McPherson's richer contextualization [...] his artful use of quotations to capture Lincoln's voice [...] and [...] his ability to convey a profound message in a handful of words."""
"By contrast, he gives an example of Wikipedia's prose that he finds ""both verbose and dull""."
"Rosenzweig also criticized the ""waffling—encouraged by the NPOV policy—[which] means that it is hard to discern any overall interpretive stance in Wikipedia history""."
"While generally praising the article on William Clarke Quantrill, he quoted its conclusion as an example of such ""waffling"", which then stated: ""Some historians [...] remember him as an opportunistic, bloodthirsty outlaw, while others continue to view him as a daring soldier and local folk hero."
"""[190] Other critics have made similar charges that, even if Wikipedia articles are factually accurate, they are often written in a poor, almost unreadable style."
"Frequent Wikipedia critic Andrew Orlowski commented, ""Even when a Wikipedia entry is 100 percent factually correct, and those facts have been carefully chosen, it all too often reads as if it has been translated from one language to another then into a third, passing an illiterate translator at each stage."
"""[191] A study of Wikipedia articles on cancer was conducted in 2010 by Yaacov Lawrence of the Kimmel Cancer Center at Thomas Jefferson University."
"The study was limited to those articles that could be found in the Physician Data Query and excluded those written at the ""start"" class or ""stub"" class level."
"Lawrence found the articles accurate but not very readable, and thought that ""Wikipedia's lack of readability (to non-college readers) may reflect its varied origins and haphazard editing""."
"[192] The Economist argued that better-written articles tend to be more reliable: ""inelegant or ranting prose usually reflects muddled thoughts and incomplete information""."
"[193] Wikipedia seeks to create a summary of all human knowledge in the form of an online encyclopedia, with each topic covered encyclopedically in one article."
"Since it has terabytes of disk space, it can have far more topics than can be covered by any printed encyclopedia."
"[194] The exact degree and manner of coverage on Wikipedia is under constant review by its editors, and disagreements are not uncommon (see deletionism and inclusionism)."
"[195][196] Wikipedia contains materials that some people may find objectionable, offensive, or pornographic."
"The 'Wikipedia is not censored' policy has sometimes proved controversial: in 2008, Wikipedia rejected an online petition against the inclusion of images of Muhammad in the English edition of its Muhammad article, citing this policy."
"The presence of politically, religiously, and pornographically sensitive materials in Wikipedia has led to the censorship of Wikipedia by national authorities in China[197] and Pakistan,[198] amongst other countries."
A 2008 study conducted by researchers at Carnegie Mellon University and Palo Alto Research Center gave a distribution of topics as well as growth (from July 2006 to January 2008) in each field:[199] These numbers refer only to the number of articles: it is possible for one topic to contain a large number of short articles and another to contain a small number of large ones.
"Through its ""Wikipedia Loves Libraries"" program, Wikipedia has partnered with major public libraries such as the New York Public Library for the Performing Arts to expand its coverage of underrepresented subjects and articles."
[200] A 2011 study conducted by researchers at the University of Minnesota indicated that male and female editors focus on different coverage topics.
"There was a greater concentration of females in the People and Arts category, while males focus more on Geography and Science."
[201] Research conducted by Mark Graham of the Oxford Internet Institute in 2009 indicated that the geographic distribution of article topics is highly uneven.
Africa is the most underrepresented.
"[202] Across 30 language editions of Wikipedia, historical articles and sections are generally Eurocentric and focused on recent events."
[203] An editorial in The Guardian in 2014 claimed that more effort went into providing references for a list of female porn actors than a list of women writers.
[204] Data has also shown that Africa-related material often faces omission; a knowledge gap that a July 2018 Wikimedia conference in Cape Town sought to address.
"[126] When multiple editors contribute to one topic or set of topics, systemic bias may arise, due to the demographic backgrounds of the editors."
"In 2011, Wales claimed that the unevenness of coverage is a reflection of the demography of the editors, citing for example ""biographies of famous women through history and issues surrounding early childcare""."
"[42] The October 22, 2013, essay by Tom Simonite in MIT's Technology Review titled ""The Decline of Wikipedia"" discussed the effect of systemic bias and policy creep on the downward trend in the number of editors."
"[43] Systemic bias on Wikipedia may follow that of culture generally,[vague] for example favoring certain nationalities, ethnicities or majority religions."
"[205] It may more specifically follow the biases of Internet culture, inclining to be young, male, English-speaking, educated, technologically aware, and wealthy enough to spare time for editing."
"Biases, intrinsically, may include an overemphasis on topics such as pop culture, technology, and current events."
"[205] Taha Yasseri of the University of Oxford, in 2013, studied the statistical trends of systemic bias at Wikipedia introduced by editing conflicts and their resolution."
[206][207] His research examined the counterproductive work behavior of edit warring.
"Yasseri contended that simple reverts or ""undo"" operations were not the most significant measure of counterproductive behavior at Wikipedia and relied instead on the statistical measurement of detecting ""reverting/reverted pairs"" or ""mutually reverting edit pairs""."
"Such a ""mutually reverting edit pair"" is defined where one editor reverts the edit of another editor who then, in sequence, returns to revert the first editor in the ""mutually reverting edit pairs""."
The results were tabulated for several language versions of Wikipedia.
"The English Wikipedia's three largest conflict rates belonged to the articles George W. Bush, Anarchism, and Muhammad."
"[207] By comparison, for the German Wikipedia, the three largest conflict rates at the time of the Oxford study were for the articles covering Croatia, Scientology, and 9/11 conspiracy theories."
[207] Researchers from Washington University developed a statistical model to measure systematic bias in the behavior of Wikipedia's users regarding controversial topics.
"The authors focused on behavioral changes of the encyclopedia's administrators after assuming the post, writing that systematic bias occurred after the fact."
[208][209] Wikipedia has been criticized for allowing information about graphic content.
"Articles depicting what some critics have called objectionable content (such as feces, cadaver, human penis, vulva, and nudity) contain graphic pictures and detailed information easily available to anyone with access to the internet, including children."
"The site also includes sexual content such as images and videos of masturbation and ejaculation, illustrations of zoophilia, and photos from hardcore pornographic films in its articles."
It also has non-sexual photographs of nude children.
"The Wikipedia article about Virgin Killer—a 1976 album from the German rock band Scorpions—features a picture of the album's original cover, which depicts a naked prepubescent girl."
The original release cover caused controversy and was replaced in some countries.
"In December 2008, access to the Wikipedia article Virgin Killer was blocked for four days by most Internet service providers in the United Kingdom after the Internet Watch Foundation (IWF) decided the album cover was a potentially illegal indecent image and added the article's URL to a ""blacklist"" it supplies to British internet service providers."
"[210] In April 2010, Sanger wrote a letter to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, outlining his concerns that two categories of images on Wikimedia Commons contained child pornography, and were in violation of US federal obscenity law."
"[211][212] Sanger later clarified that the images, which were related to pedophilia and one about lolicon, were not of real children, but said that they constituted ""obscene visual representations of the sexual abuse of children"", under the PROTECT Act of 2003."
[213] That law bans photographic child pornography and cartoon images and drawings of children that are obscene under American law.
[213] Sanger also expressed concerns about access to the images on Wikipedia in schools.
"[214] Wikimedia Foundation spokesman Jay Walsh strongly rejected Sanger's accusation,[215] saying that Wikipedia did not have ""material we would deem to be illegal."
"If we did, we would remove it."
"""[215] Following the complaint by Sanger, Wales deleted sexual images without consulting the community."
"After some editors who volunteer to maintain the site argued that the decision to delete had been made hastily, Wales voluntarily gave up some of the powers he had held up to that time as part of his co-founder status."
"He wrote in a message to the Wikimedia Foundation mailing-list that this action was ""in the interest of encouraging this discussion to be about real philosophical/content issues, rather than be about me and how quickly I acted""."
"[216] Critics, including Wikipediocracy, noticed that many of the pornographic images deleted from Wikipedia since 2010 have reappeared."
"[217] One privacy concern in the case of Wikipedia is the right of a private citizen to remain a ""private citizen"" rather than a ""public figure"" in the eyes of the law."
"[218][note 6] It is a battle between the right to be anonymous in cyberspace and the right to be anonymous in real life (""meatspace"")."
A particular problem occurs in the case of a relatively unimportant individual and for whom there exists a Wikipedia page against her or his wishes.
"In January 2006, a German court ordered the German Wikipedia shut down within Germany because it stated the full name of Boris Floricic, aka ""Tron"", a deceased hacker."
"On February 9, 2006, the injunction against Wikimedia Deutschland was overturned, with the court rejecting the notion that Tron's right to privacy or that of his parents was being violated."
"[219] Wikipedia has a ""Volunteer Response Team"" that uses the OTRS system to handle queries without having to reveal the identities of the involved parties."
"This is used, for example, in confirming the permission for using individual images and other media in the project."
[220] Wikipedia has been described as harboring a battleground culture of sexism and harassment.
[221][222] The perceived toxic attitudes and tolerance of violent and abusive language are also reasons put forth for the gender gap in Wikipedia editors.
"[223] In 2014, a female editor who requested a separate space on Wikipedia to discuss improving civility had her proposal referred to by a male editor using the words ""the easiest way to avoid being called a cunt is not to act like one""."
"[221] Wikipedia is hosted and funded by the Wikimedia Foundation, a non-profit organization which also operates Wikipedia-related projects such as Wiktionary and Wikibooks."
The foundation relies on public contributions and grants to fund its mission.
"[224] The foundation's 2013 IRS Form 990 shows revenue of $39.7 million and expenses of almost $29 million, with assets of $37.2 million and liabilities of about $2.3 million."
"[225] In May 2014, Wikimedia Foundation named Lila Tretikov as its second executive director, taking over for Sue Gardner."
"[226] The Wall Street Journal reported on May 1, 2014, that Tretikov's information technology background from her years at University of California offers Wikipedia an opportunity to develop in more concentrated directions guided by her often repeated position statement that, ""Information, like air, wants to be free."
"""[227][228] The same Wall Street Journal article reported these directions of development according to an interview with spokesman Jay Walsh of Wikimedia, who ""said Tretikov would address that issue (paid advocacy) as a priority."
'We are really pushing toward more transparency ... We are reinforcing that paid advocacy is not welcome.'
"Initiatives to involve greater diversity of contributors, better mobile support of Wikipedia, new geo-location tools to find local content more easily, and more tools for users in the second and third world are also priorities,"" Walsh said."
"[227] Following the departure of Tretikov from Wikipedia due to issues concerning the use of the ""superprotection"" feature which some language versions of Wikipedia have adopted, Katherine Maher became the third executive director of the Wikimedia Foundation in June 2016."
[229] Maher has stated that one of her priorities would be the issue of editor harassment endemic to Wikipedia as identified by the Wikipedia board in December.
"Maher stated regarding the harassment issue that: ""It establishes a sense within the community that this is a priority ... (and that correction requires that) it has to be more than words."
"""[230] Wikipedia is also supported by many organizations and groups that are affiliated with the Wikimedia Foundation but independently-run, called Wikimedia movement affiliates."
"These include Wikimedia chapters (which are national or sub-national organizations, such as Wikimedia Deutschland and Wikimédia France), thematic organizations (such as Amical Wikimedia for the Catalan language community), and user groups."
"These affiliates participate in the promotion, development, and funding of Wikipedia."
"The operation of Wikipedia depends on MediaWiki, a custom-made, free and open source wiki software platform written in PHP and built upon the MySQL database system."
"[231] The software incorporates programming features such as a macro language, variables, a transclusion system for templates, and URL redirection."
"MediaWiki is licensed under the GNU General Public License (GPL) and it is used by all Wikimedia projects, as well as many other wiki projects."
"Originally, Wikipedia ran on UseModWiki written in Perl by Clifford Adams (Phase I), which initially required CamelCase for article hyperlinks; the present double bracket style was incorporated later."
"Starting in January 2002 (Phase II), Wikipedia began running on a PHP wiki engine with a MySQL database; this software was custom-made for Wikipedia by Magnus Manske."
The Phase II software was repeatedly modified to accommodate the exponentially increasing demand.
"In July 2002 (Phase III), Wikipedia shifted to the third-generation software, MediaWiki, originally written by Lee Daniel Crocker."
Several MediaWiki extensions are installed[232] to extend the functionality of the MediaWiki software.
"In April 2005, a Lucene extension[233][234] was added to MediaWiki's built-in search and Wikipedia switched from MySQL to Lucene for searching."
"The site currently uses Lucene Search 2.1,[235][needs update] which is written in Java and based on Lucene library 2.3."
"[236] In July 2013, after extensive beta testing, a WYSIWYG (What You See Is What You Get) extension, VisualEditor, was opened to public use."
"[237][238][239][240] It was met with much rejection and criticism, and was described as ""slow and buggy""."
[241] The feature was changed from opt-out to opt-in afterward.
"Computer programs called bots have often been used to perform simple and repetitive tasks, such as correcting common misspellings and stylistic issues, or to start articles such as geography entries in a standard format from statistical data."
"[242][243][244] One controversial contributor, Sverker Johansson [sv], creating articles with his bot was reported to create up to 10,000 articles on the Swedish Wikipedia on certain days."
"[245] Additionally, there are bots designed to automatically notify editors when they make common editing errors (such as unmatched quotes or unmatched parentheses)."
[246] Edits falsely identified by bots as the work of a banned editor can be restored by other editors.
An anti-vandal bot is programmed to detect and revert vandalism quickly.
"[243] Bots are able to indicate edits from particular accounts or IP address ranges, as occurred at the time of the shooting down of the MH17 jet incident in July 2014 when it was reported edits were made via IPs controlled by the Russian government."
[247] Bots on Wikipedia must be approved before activation.
"[248] According to Andrew Lih, the current expansion of Wikipedia to millions of articles would be difficult to envision without the use of such bots."
"[249] Wikipedia receives between 25,000 and 60,000-page requests per second, depending on the time of the day."
"[250][needs update] As of 2019[update], page requests are first passed to a front-end layer of Varnish caching servers."
"[251][needs update] Further statistics, based on a publicly available 3-month Wikipedia access trace, are available."
"[252] Requests that cannot be served from the Varnish cache are sent to load-balancing servers running the Linux Virtual Server software, which in turn pass them to one of the Apache web servers for page rendering from the database."
"The web servers deliver pages as requested, performing page rendering for all the language editions of Wikipedia."
"To increase speed further, rendered pages are cached in a distributed memory cache until invalidated, allowing page rendering to be skipped entirely for most common page accesses."
[citation needed] Wikipedia currently runs on dedicated clusters of Linux servers (mainly Ubuntu).
"[253][254][needs update] As of December 2009[update], there were 300 in Florida and 44 in Amsterdam."
"[255] By January 22, 2013, Wikipedia had migrated its primary data center to an Equinix facility in Ashburn, Virginia."
"[256][257] in 2017, Wikipedia had installed a caching cluster in an Equinix facility in Singapore, the first of its kind in Asia."
"[258] Following growing amounts of incoming donations exceeding seven digits in 2013 as recently reported,[43] the Foundation has reached a threshold of assets which qualify its consideration under the principles of industrial organization economics to indicate the need for the re-investment of donations into the internal research and development of the Foundation."
"[259] Two of the recent projects of such internal research and development have been the creation of a Visual Editor and a largely under-utilized ""Thank"" tab which were developed to ameliorate issues of editor attrition, which have met with limited success."
"[43][241] The estimates for reinvestment by industrial organizations into internal research and development was studied by Adam Jaffe, who recorded that the range of 4% to 25% annually was to be recommended, with high-end technology requiring the higher level of support for internal reinvestment."
"[260] At the 2013 level of contributions for Wikimedia presently documented as 45 million dollars, the computed budget level recommended by Jaffe and Caballero for reinvestment into internal research and development is between 1.8 million and 11.3 million dollars annually."
"[260] In 2016, the level of contributions were reported by Bloomberg News as being at $77 million annually, updating the Jaffe estimates for the higher level of support to between $3.08 million and $19.2 million annually."
"[260] Community-produced news publications include the English Wikipedia's The Signpost, founded in 2005 by Michael Snow, an attorney, Wikipedia administrator, and former chair of the Wikimedia Foundation board of trustees."
"[261] It covers news and events from the site, as well as major events from other Wikimedia projects, such as Wikimedia Commons."
"Similar publications are the German-language Kurier, and the Portuguese-language Correio da Wikipédia."
"Other past and present community news publications on English Wikipedia include the Wikiworld webcomic, the Wikipedia Weekly podcast, and newsletters of specific WikiProjects like The Bugle from WikiProject Military History and the monthly newsletter from The Guild of Copy Editors."
There are also several publications from the Wikimedia Foundation and multilingual publications such as Wikimedia Diff and This Month in Education.
"When the project was started in 2001, all text in Wikipedia was covered by the GNU Free Documentation License (GFDL), a copyleft license permitting the redistribution, creation of derivative works, and commercial use of content while authors retain copyright of their work."
[262] The GFDL was created for software manuals that come with free software programs licensed under the GPL.
"This made it a poor choice for a general reference work: for example, the GFDL requires the reprints of materials from Wikipedia to come with a full copy of the GFDL text."
"In December 2002, the Creative Commons license was released: it was specifically designed for creative works in general, not just for software manuals."
The license gained popularity among bloggers and others distributing creative works on the Web.
The Wikipedia project sought the switch to the Creative Commons.
"[263] Because the two licenses, GFDL and Creative Commons, were incompatible, in November 2008, following the request of the project, the Free Software Foundation (FSF) released a new version of the GFDL designed specifically to allow Wikipedia to relicense its content to CC BY-SA by August 1, 2009."
(A new version of the GFDL automatically covers Wikipedia contents.)
"In April 2009, Wikipedia and its sister projects held a community-wide referendum which decided the switch in June 2009."
[264][265][266][267] The handling of media files (e.g.
image files) varies across language editions.
"Some language editions, such as the English Wikipedia, include non-free image files under fair use doctrine, while the others have opted not to, in part because of the lack of fair use doctrines in their home countries (e.g."
in Japanese copyright law).
Media files covered by free content licenses (e.g.
"Creative Commons' CC BY-SA) are shared across language editions via Wikimedia Commons repository, a project operated by the Wikimedia Foundation."
Wikipedia's accommodation of varying international copyright laws regarding images has led some to observe that its photographic coverage of topics lags behind the quality of the encyclopedic text.
"[268] The Wikimedia Foundation is not a licensor of content, but merely a hosting service for the contributors (and licensors) of the Wikipedia."
This position has been successfully defended in court.
"[269][270] Because Wikipedia content is distributed under an open license, anyone can reuse or re-distribute it at no charge."
"The content of Wikipedia has been published in many forms, both online and offline, outside the Wikipedia website."
"Obtaining the full contents of Wikipedia for reuse presents challenges, since direct cloning via a web crawler is discouraged."
"[281] Wikipedia publishes ""dumps"" of its contents, but these are text-only; as of 2007[update] there was no dump available of Wikipedia's images."
"[282] Several languages of Wikipedia also maintain a reference desk, where volunteers answer questions from the general public."
"According to a study by Pnina Shachaf in the Journal of Documentation, the quality of the Wikipedia reference desk is comparable to a standard library reference desk, with an accuracy of 55 percent."
[283] Wikipedia's original medium was for users to read and edit content using any standard web browser through a fixed Internet connection.
"Although Wikipedia content has been accessible through the mobile web since July 2013, The New York Times on February 9, 2014, quoted Erik Möller, deputy director of the Wikimedia Foundation, stating that the transition of internet traffic from desktops to mobile devices was significant and a cause for concern and worry."
"[8] The article in The New York Times reported the comparison statistics for mobile edits stating that, ""Only 20 percent of the readership of the English-language Wikipedia comes via mobile devices, a figure substantially lower than the percentage of mobile traffic for other media sites, many of which approach 50 percent."
And the shift to mobile editing has lagged even more.
"""[8] The New York Times reports that Möller has assigned ""a team of 10 software developers focused on mobile"", out of a total of approximately 200 employees working at the Wikimedia Foundation."
"One principal concern cited by The New York Times for the ""worry"" is for Wikipedia to effectively address attrition issues with the number of editors which the online encyclopedia attracts to edit and maintain its content in a mobile access environment."
[8] Bloomberg Businessweek reported in July 2014 that Google's Android mobile apps have dominated the largest share of global smartphone shipments for 2013 with 78.6% of market share over their next closest competitor in iOS with 15.2% of the market.
"[284] At the time of the Tretikov appointment and her posted web interview with Sue Gardner in May 2014, Wikimedia representatives made a technical announcement concerning the number of mobile access systems in the market seeking access to Wikipedia."
"Directly after the posted web interview, the representatives stated that Wikimedia would be applying an all-inclusive approach to accommodate as many mobile access systems as possible in its efforts for expanding general mobile access, including BlackBerry and the Windows Phone system, making market share a secondary issue."
"[228] The latest version of the Android app for Wikipedia was released on July 23, 2014, to generally positive reviews, scoring over four of a possible five in a poll of approximately 200,000 users downloading from Google."
"[285] The latest version for iOS was released on April 3, 2013, to similar reviews."
"[286] Access to Wikipedia from mobile phones was possible as early as 2004, through the Wireless Application Protocol (WAP), via the Wapedia service."
"In June 2007 Wikipedia launched en.mobile.wikipedia.org, an official website for wireless devices."
"In 2009 a newer mobile service was officially released,[287] located at en.m.wikipedia.org, which caters to more advanced mobile devices such as the iPhone, Android-based devices or WebOS-based devices."
Several other methods of mobile access to Wikipedia have emerged.
"Many devices and applications optimize or enhance the display of Wikipedia content for mobile devices, while some also incorporate additional features such as use of Wikipedia metadata (see Wikipedia:Metadata), such as geoinformation."
[288][289] Wikipedia Zero was an initiative of the Wikimedia Foundation to expand the reach of the encyclopedia to the developing countries.
[290] It was discontinued in February 2018.
[291] Andrew Lih and Andrew Brown both maintain editing Wikipedia with smartphones is difficult and this discourages new potential contributors.
The number of Wikipedia editors has been declining after several years and Tom Simonite of MIT Technology Review claims the bureaucratic structure and rules are a factor in this.
Simonite alleges some Wikipedians use the labyrinthine rules and guidelines to dominate others and those editors have a vested interest in keeping the status quo.
[43] Lih alleges there is a serious disagreement among existing contributors on how to resolve this.
Lih fears for Wikipedia's long-term future while Brown fears problems with Wikipedia will remain and rival encyclopedias will not replace it.
"[292][293] In 2017–18, after a barrage of false news reports, both Facebook and YouTube announced they would rely on Wikipedia to help their users evaluate reports and reject false news."
"Noam Cohen, writing in The Washington Post states, ""YouTube's reliance on Wikipedia to set the record straight builds on the thinking of another fact-challenged platform, the Facebook social network, which announced last year that Wikipedia would help its users root out 'fake news'."
"""[12] As of November 2020, Alexa records the daily pageviews per visitor as 3.03 and the average daily time on site as 3:46 minutes."
"[3] In February 2014, The New York Times reported that Wikipedia was ranked fifth globally among all websites, stating ""With 18 billion page views and nearly 500 million unique visitors a month [...] Wikipedia trails just Yahoo, Facebook, Microsoft and Google, the largest with 1.2 billion unique visitors."
"""[8] However, its ranking dropped to 13th globally by June 2020 due mostly to a rise in popularity of Chinese websites for online shopping."
"[294] In addition to logistic growth in the number of its articles,[295] Wikipedia has steadily gained status as a general reference website since its inception in 2001."
"[296] About 50 percent of search engine traffic to Wikipedia comes from Google,[297] a good portion of which is related to academic research."
[298] The number of readers of Wikipedia worldwide reached 365 million at the end of 2009.
[299] The Pew Internet and American Life project found that one third of US Internet users consulted Wikipedia.
[300] In 2011 Business Insider gave Wikipedia a valuation of $4 billion if it ran advertisements.
"[301] According to ""Wikipedia Readership Survey 2011"", the average age of Wikipedia readers is 36, with a rough parity between genders."
"Almost half of Wikipedia readers visit the site more than five times a month, and a similar number of readers specifically look for Wikipedia in search engine results."
About 47 percent of Wikipedia readers do not realize that Wikipedia is a non-profit organization.
"[302] During the COVID-19 pandemic, Wikipedia's coverage of the pandemic received international media attention, and brought an increase in Wikipedia readership overall."
"[303] Wikipedia's content has also been used in academic studies, books, conferences, and court cases."
"[304][305][306] The Parliament of Canada's website refers to Wikipedia's article on same-sex marriage in the ""related links"" section of its ""further reading"" list for the Civil Marriage Act."
[307] The encyclopedia's assertions are increasingly used as a source by organizations such as the US federal courts and the World Intellectual Property Organization[308]—though mainly for supporting information rather than information decisive to a case.
[309] Content appearing on Wikipedia has also been cited as a source and referenced in some US intelligence agency reports.
"[310] In December 2008, the scientific journal RNA Biology launched a new section for descriptions of families of RNA molecules and requires authors who contribute to the section to also submit a draft article on the RNA family for publication in Wikipedia."
"[311] Wikipedia has also been used as a source in journalism,[312][313] often without attribution, and several reporters have been dismissed for plagiarizing from Wikipedia."
"[314][315][316] In 2006, Time magazine recognized Wikipedia's participation (along with YouTube, Reddit, MySpace, and Facebook)[317] in the rapid growth of online collaboration and interaction by millions of people worldwide."
"In July 2007, Wikipedia was the focus of a 30-minute documentary on BBC Radio 4[318] which argued that, with increased usage and awareness, the number of references to Wikipedia in popular culture is such that the word is one of a select group of 21st-century nouns that are so familiar (Google, Facebook, YouTube) that they no longer need explanation."
"On September 28, 2007, Italian politician Franco Grillini raised a parliamentary question with the minister of cultural resources and activities about the necessity of freedom of panorama."
"He said that the lack of such freedom forced Wikipedia, ""the seventh most consulted website"", to forbid all images of modern Italian buildings and art, and claimed this was hugely damaging to tourist revenues."
"[319] On September 16, 2007, The Washington Post reported that Wikipedia had become a focal point in the 2008 US election campaign, saying: ""Type a candidate's name into Google, and among the first results is a Wikipedia page, making those entries arguably as important as any ad in defining a candidate."
"Already, the presidential entries are being edited, dissected and debated countless times each day."
"""[320] An October 2007 Reuters article, titled ""Wikipedia page the latest status symbol"", reported the recent phenomenon of how having a Wikipedia article vindicates one's notability."
[321] Active participation also has an impact.
Law students have been assigned to write Wikipedia articles as an exercise in clear and succinct writing for an uninitiated audience.
"[322] A working group led by Peter Stone (formed as a part of the Stanford-based project One Hundred Year Study on Artificial Intelligence) in its report called Wikipedia ""the best-known example of crowdsourcing ... that far exceeds traditionally-compiled information sources, such as encyclopedias and dictionaries, in scale and depth."
"""[323] In a 2017 opinion piece for Wired, Hossein Derakhshan describes Wikipedia as ""one of the last remaining pillars of the open and decentralized web"" and contrasted its existence as a text-based source of knowledge with social media and social networking services, the latter having ""since colonized the web for television's values""."
"For Derakhshan, Wikipedia's goal as an encyclopedia represents the Age of Enlightenment tradition of rationality triumphing over emotions, a trend which he considers ""endangered"" due to the ""gradual shift from a typographic culture to a photographic one, which in turn mean[s] a shift from rationality to emotions, exposition to entertainment""."
"Rather than ""sapere aude"" (lit."
"''dare to know''), social networks have led to a culture of ""[d]are not to care to know""."
"This is while Wikipedia faces ""a more concerning problem"" than funding, namely ""a flattening growth rate in the number of contributors to the website""."
"Consequently, the challenge for Wikipedia and those who use it is to ""save Wikipedia and its promise of a free and open collection of all human knowledge amid the conquest of new and old television—how to collect and preserve knowledge when nobody cares to know."
"""[324] Wikipedia won two major awards in May 2004."
"[325] The first was a Golden Nica for Digital Communities of the annual Prix Ars Electronica contest; this came with a €10,000 (£6,588; $12,700) grant and an invitation to present at the PAE Cyberarts Festival in Austria later that year."
"The second was a Judges' Webby Award for the ""community"" category."
"[326] Wikipedia was also nominated for a ""Best Practices"" Webby award."
"In 2007, readers of brandchannel.com voted Wikipedia as the fourth-highest brand ranking, receiving 15 percent of the votes in answer to the question ""Which brand had the most impact on our lives in 2006?"
"""[327] In September 2008, Wikipedia received Quadriga A Mission of Enlightenment award of Werkstatt Deutschland along with Boris Tadić, Eckart Höfling, and Peter Gabriel."
The award was presented to Wales by David Weinberger.
"[328] In 2015, Wikipedia was awarded both the annual Erasmus Prize, which recognizes exceptional contributions to culture, society or social sciences,[329] and the Spanish Princess of Asturias Award on International Cooperation."
"[330] Speaking at the Asturian Parliament in Oviedo, the city that hosts the awards ceremony, Jimmy Wales praised the work of the Asturian language Wikipedia users."
"[331] The night of the ceremony, members of the Wikimedia Foundation held a meeting with Wikipedians from all parts of Spain, including the local Asturian community."
"Many parodies target Wikipedia's openness and susceptibility to inserted inaccuracies, with characters vandalizing or modifying the online encyclopedia project's articles."
"Comedian Stephen Colbert has parodied or referenced Wikipedia on numerous episodes of his show The Colbert Report and coined the related term wikiality, meaning ""together we can create a reality that we all agree on—the reality we just agreed on""."
"[177] Another example can be found in ""Wikipedia Celebrates 750 Years of American Independence"", a July 2006 front-page article in The Onion,[332] as well as the 2010 The Onion article ""'L.A."
"Law' Wikipedia Page Viewed 874 Times Today""."
"[333] In an episode of the television comedy The Office U.S., which aired in April 2007, an incompetent office manager (Michael Scott) is shown relying on a hypothetical Wikipedia article for information on negotiation tactics to assist him in negotiating lesser pay for an employee."
"[334] Viewers of the show tried to add the episode's mention of the page as a section of the actual Wikipedia article on negotiation, but this effort was prevented by other users on the article's talk page."
"[335] ""My Number One Doctor"", a 2007 episode of the television show Scrubs, played on the perception that Wikipedia is an unreliable reference tool with a scene in which Perry Cox reacts to a patient who says that a Wikipedia article indicates that the raw food diet reverses the effects of bone cancer by retorting that the same editor who wrote that article also wrote the Battlestar Galactica episode guide."
"[336] In 2008, the comedic website CollegeHumor produced a video sketch named ""Professor Wikipedia"", in which the fictitious Professor Wikipedia instructs a class with a medley of unverifiable and occasionally absurd statements."
"[337] The Dilbert comic strip from May 8, 2009, features a character supporting an improbable claim by saying ""Give me ten minutes and then check Wikipedia."
"""[338] In July 2009, BBC Radio 4 broadcast a comedy series called Bigipedia, which was set on a website which was a parody of Wikipedia."
Some of the sketches were directly inspired by Wikipedia and its articles.
"[339] On August 23, 2013, the New Yorker website published a cartoon with this caption: ""Dammit, Manning, have you considered the pronoun war that this is going to start on your Wikipedia page?"
"""[340] The cartoon referred to Chelsea Elizabeth Manning (born Bradley Edward Manning), an American activist, politician, and former United States Army soldier and a trans woman."
"In December 2015, John Julius Norwich stated, in a letter published in The Times newspaper, that as a historian he resorted to Wikipedia ""at least a dozen times a day"", and had never yet caught it out."
"He described it as ""a work of reference as useful as any in existence"", with so wide a range that it is almost impossible to find a person, place, or thing that it has left uncovered and that he could never have written his last two books without it."
"[341][342] Wikipedia has also spawned several sister projects, which are also wikis run by the Wikimedia Foundation."
"These other Wikimedia projects include Wiktionary, a dictionary project launched in December 2002,[343] Wikiquote, a collection of quotations created a week after Wikimedia launched, Wikibooks, a collection of collaboratively written free textbooks and annotated texts, Wikimedia Commons, a site devoted to free-knowledge multimedia, Wikinews, for citizen journalism, and Wikiversity, a project for the creation of free learning materials and the provision of online learning activities."
"[344] Another sister project of Wikipedia, Wikispecies, is a catalogue of species."
"In 2012 Wikivoyage, an editable travel guide, and Wikidata, an editable knowledge base, launched."
"The most obvious economic effect of Wikipedia has been the death of commercial encyclopedias, especially the printed versions, e.g."
"Encyclopædia Britannica, which were unable to compete with a product that is essentially free."
"[345][346][347] Nicholas Carr wrote a 2005 essay, ""The amorality of Web 2.0"", that criticized websites with user-generated content, like Wikipedia, for possibly leading to professional (and, in his view, superior) content producers' going out of business, because ""free trumps quality all the time""."
"Carr wrote: ""Implicit in the ecstatic visions of Web 2.0 is the hegemony of the amateur."
I for one can't imagine anything more frightening.
"""[348] Others dispute the notion that Wikipedia, or similar efforts, will entirely displace traditional publications."
"For instance, Chris Anderson, the editor-in-chief of Wired Magazine, wrote in Nature that the ""wisdom of crowds"" approach of Wikipedia will not displace top scientific journals, with their rigorous peer review process."
[349] There is also an ongoing debate about the influence of Wikipedia on the biography publishing business.
"""The worry is that, if you can get all that information from Wikipedia, what's left for biography?"""
"said Kathryn Hughes, professor of life writing at the University of East Anglia and author of The Short Life and Long Times of Mrs Beeton and George Eliot: the Last Victorian."
"[350] Wikipedia has been widely used as a corpus for linguistic research in computational linguistics, information retrieval and natural language processing."
"In particular, it commonly serves as a target knowledge base for the entity linking problem, which is then called ""wikification"",[351] and to the related problem of word-sense disambiguation."
"[352] Methods similar to wikification can in turn be used to find ""missing"" links in Wikipedia."
"[353] In 2015, French researchers José Lages of the University of Franche-Comté in Besançon and Dima Shepelyansky of Paul Sabatier University in Toulouse published a global university ranking based on Wikipedia scholarly citations."
"[354][355][356] They used PageRank ""followed by the number of appearances in the 24 different language editions of Wikipedia (descending order) and the century in which they were founded (ascending order)""."
[356] A 2017 MIT study suggests that words used on Wikipedia articles end up in scientific publications.
[357][358] Studies related to Wikipedia have been using machine learning and artificial intelligence to support various operations.
One of the most important areas—automatic detection of vandalism[359][360] and data quality assessment in Wikipedia.
[361] Several interactive multimedia encyclopedias incorporating entries written by the public existed long before Wikipedia was founded.
"The first of these was the 1986 BBC Domesday Project, which included text (entered on BBC Micro computers) and photographs from more than a million contributors in the UK, and covered the geography, art, and culture of the UK."
"This was the first interactive multimedia encyclopedia (and was also the first major multimedia document connected through internal links), with the majority of articles being accessible through an interactive map of the UK."
The user interface and part of the content of the Domesday Project were emulated on a website until 2008.
"[362] Several free-content, collaborative encyclopedias were created around the same period as Wikipedia (e.g."
"Everything2),[363] with many later being merged into the project (e.g."
GNE).
"[364] One of the most successful early online encyclopedias incorporating entries by the public was h2g2, which was created by Douglas Adams in 1999."
"The h2g2 encyclopedia is relatively lighthearted, focusing on articles which are both witty and informative."
Subsequent collaborative knowledge websites have drawn inspiration from Wikipedia.
"Some, such as Susning.nu, Enciclopedia Libre, Hudong, and Baidu Baike likewise employ no formal review process, although some like Conservapedia are not as open."
"Others use more traditional peer review, such as Encyclopedia of Life and the online wiki encyclopedias Scholarpedia and Citizendium."
The latter was started by Sanger in an attempt to create a reliable alternative to Wikipedia.
[365][366] Machine learning (ML) is the study of computer algorithms that improve automatically through experience.
[1] It is seen as a part of artificial intelligence.
"Machine learning algorithms build a model based on sample data, known as ""training data"", in order to make predictions or decisions without being explicitly programmed to do so."
"[2] Machine learning algorithms are used in a wide variety of applications, such as email filtering and computer vision, where it is difficult or unfeasible to develop conventional algorithms to perform the needed tasks."
"A subset of machine learning is closely related to computational statistics, which focuses on making predictions using computers; but not all machine learning is statistical learning."
"The study of mathematical optimization delivers methods, theory and application domains to the field of machine learning."
"Data mining is a related field of study, focusing on exploratory data analysis through unsupervised learning."
"[4][5] In its application across business problems, machine learning is also referred to as predictive analytics."
Machine learning involves computers discovering how they can perform tasks without being explicitly programmed to do so.
It involves computers learning from data provided so that they carry out certain tasks.
"For simple tasks assigned to computers, it is possible to program algorithms telling the machine how to execute all steps required to solve the problem at hand; on the computer's part, no learning is needed."
"For more advanced tasks, it can be challenging for a human to manually create the needed algorithms."
"In practice, it can turn out to be more effective to help the machine develop its own algorithm, rather than having human programmers specify every needed step."
[6] The discipline of machine learning employs various approaches to teach computers to accomplish tasks where no fully satisfactory algorithm is available.
"In cases where vast numbers of potential answers exist, one approach is to label some of the correct answers as valid."
This can then be used as training data for the computer to improve the algorithm(s) it uses to determine correct answers.
"For example, to train a system for the task of digital character recognition, the MNIST dataset of handwritten digits has often been used."
"[6] Machine learning approaches are traditionally divided into three broad categories, depending on the nature of the ""signal"" or ""feedback"" available to the learning system: Other approaches have been developed which don't fit neatly into this three-fold categorisation, and sometimes more than one is used by the same machine learning system."
"For example topic modeling, dimensionality reduction or meta learning."
"[7] As of 2020, deep learning has become the dominant approach for much ongoing work in the field of machine learning."
"[6] The term machine learning was coined in 1959 by Arthur Samuel, an American IBMer and pioneer in the field of computer gaming and artificial intelligence."
"[8][9] A representative book of the machine learning research during the 1960s was the Nilsson's book on Learning Machines, dealing mostly with machine learning for pattern classification."
"[10] Interest related to pattern recognition continued into the 1970s, as described by Duda and Hart in 1973."
"[11] In 1981 a report was given on using teaching strategies so that a neural network learns to recognize 40 characters (26 letters, 10 digits, and 4 special symbols) from a computer terminal."
"[12] Tom M. Mitchell provided a widely quoted, more formal definition of the algorithms studied in the machine learning field: ""A computer program is said to learn from experience E with respect to some class of tasks T and performance measure P if its performance at tasks in T, as measured by P,  improves with experience E.""[13] This definition of the tasks in which machine learning is concerned offers a fundamentally operational definition rather than defining the field in cognitive terms."
"This follows Alan Turing's proposal in his paper ""Computing Machinery and Intelligence"", in which the question ""Can machines think?"""
"is replaced with the question ""Can machines do what we (as thinking entities) can do?""."
"[14] Modern day machine learning has two objectives, one is to classify data based on models which have been developed, the other purpose is to make predictions for future outcomes based on these models."
A hypothetical algorithm specific to classifying data may use computer vision of moles coupled with supervised learning in order to train it to classify the cancerous moles.
"Where as, a machine learning algorithm for stock trading may inform the trader of future potential predictions."
"[15] As a scientific endeavor, machine learning grew out of the quest for artificial intelligence."
"In the early days of AI as an academic discipline, some researchers were interested in having machines learn from data."
"They attempted to approach the problem with various symbolic methods, as well as what was then termed ""neural networks""; these were mostly perceptrons and other models that were later found to be reinventions of the generalized linear models of statistics."
"[18] Probabilistic reasoning was also employed, especially in automated medical diagnosis."
"[19]:488 However, an increasing emphasis on the logical, knowledge-based approach caused a rift between AI and machine learning."
Probabilistic systems were plagued by theoretical and practical problems of data acquisition and representation.
"[19]:488 By 1980, expert systems had come to dominate AI, and statistics was out of favor."
"[20] Work on symbolic/knowledge-based learning did continue within AI, leading to inductive logic programming, but the more statistical line of research was now outside the field of AI proper, in pattern recognition and information retrieval."
[19]:708–710; 755 Neural networks research had been abandoned by AI and computer science around the same time.
"This line, too, was continued outside the AI/CS field, as ""connectionism"", by researchers from other disciplines including Hopfield, Rumelhart and Hinton."
Their main success came in the mid-1980s with the reinvention of backpropagation.
"[19]:25 Machine learning (ML), reorganized as a separate field, started to flourish in the 1990s."
The field changed its goal from achieving artificial intelligence to tackling solvable problems of a practical nature.
"It shifted focus away from the symbolic approaches it had inherited from AI, and toward methods and models borrowed from statistics and probability theory."
"[20] As of 2020, many sources continue to assert that machine learning remains a subfield of AI."
"[21][22][16] The main disagreement is whether all of ML is part of AI, as this would mean that anyone using ML could claim they are using AI."
Others have the view that not all of ML is part of AI[23][24][25] where only an 'intelligent' subset of ML is part of AI.
[26] The question to what is the difference between ML and AI is answered by Judea Pearl in The Book of Why.
"[27] Accordingly ML learns and predicts based on passive observations, whereas AI implies an agent  interacting with the environment to learn and take actions that maximize its chance of successfully achieving its goals."
"[30] Machine learning and data mining often employ the same methods and overlap significantly, but while machine learning focuses on prediction, based on known properties learned from the training data, data mining focuses on the discovery of (previously) unknown properties in the data (this is the analysis step of knowledge discovery in databases)."
"Data mining uses many machine learning methods, but with different goals; on the other hand, machine learning also employs data mining methods as ""unsupervised learning"" or as a preprocessing step to improve learner accuracy."
"Much of the confusion between these two research communities (which do often have separate conferences and separate journals, ECML PKDD being a major exception) comes from the basic assumptions they work with: in machine learning, performance is usually evaluated with respect to the ability to reproduce known knowledge, while in knowledge discovery and data mining (KDD) the key task is the discovery of previously unknown knowledge."
"Evaluated with respect to known knowledge, an uninformed (unsupervised) method will easily be outperformed by other supervised methods, while in a typical KDD task, supervised methods cannot be used due to the unavailability of training data."
Machine learning also has intimate ties to optimization: many learning problems are formulated as minimization of some loss function on a training set of examples.
"Loss functions express the discrepancy between the predictions of the model being trained and the actual problem instances (for example, in classification, one wants to assign a label to instances, and models are trained to correctly predict the pre-assigned labels of a set of examples)."
"[31] The difference between optimization and machine learning arises from the goal of generalization: while optimization algorithms can minimize the loss on a training set, machine learning is concerned with minimizing the loss on unseen samples."
"Characterizing the generalization of various learning algorithms is an active topic of current research, especially for deep learning algorithms."
"Machine learning and statistics are closely related fields in terms of methods, but distinct in their principal goal: statistics draws population inferences from a sample, while machine learning finds generalizable predictive patterns."
"[32] According to Michael I. Jordan, the ideas of machine learning, from methodological principles to theoretical tools, have had a long pre-history in statistics."
[33] He also suggested the term data science as a placeholder to call the overall field.
"[33] Leo Breiman distinguished two statistical modeling paradigms: data model and algorithmic model,[34] wherein ""algorithmic model"" means more or less the machine learning algorithms like Random forest."
"Some statisticians have adopted methods from machine learning, leading to a combined field that they call statistical learning."
[35] A core objective of a learner is to generalize from its experience.
"[3][36] Generalization in this context is the ability of a learning machine to perform accurately on new, unseen examples/tasks after having experienced a learning data set."
The training examples come from some generally unknown probability distribution (considered representative of the space of occurrences) and the learner has to build a general model about this space that enables it to produce sufficiently accurate predictions in new cases.
The computational analysis of machine learning algorithms and their performance is a branch of theoretical computer science known as computational learning theory.
"Because training sets are finite and the future is uncertain, learning theory usually does not yield guarantees of the performance of algorithms."
"Instead, probabilistic bounds on the performance are quite common."
The bias–variance decomposition is one way to quantify generalization error.
"For the best performance in the context of generalization, the complexity of the hypothesis should match the complexity of the function underlying the data."
"If the hypothesis is less complex than the function, then the model has under fitted the data."
"If the complexity of the model is increased in response, then the training error decreases."
"But if the hypothesis is too complex, then the model is subject to overfitting and generalization will be poorer."
"[37] In addition to performance bounds, learning theorists study the time complexity and feasibility of learning."
"In computational learning theory, a computation is considered feasible if it can be done in polynomial time."
There are two kinds of time complexity results.
Positive results show that a certain class of functions can be learned in polynomial time.
Negative results show that certain classes cannot be learned in polynomial time.
"The types of machine learning algorithms differ in their approach, the type of data they input and output, and the type of task or problem that they are intended to solve."
Supervised learning algorithms build a mathematical model of a set of data that contains both the inputs and the desired outputs.
"[38] The data is known as training data, and consists of a set of training examples."
"Each training example has one or more inputs and the desired output, also known as a supervisory signal."
"In the mathematical model, each training example is represented by an array or vector, sometimes called a feature vector, and the training data is represented by a matrix."
"Through iterative optimization of an objective function, supervised learning algorithms learn a function that can be used to predict the output associated with new inputs."
[39] An optimal function will allow the algorithm to correctly determine the output for inputs that were not a part of the training data.
An algorithm that improves the accuracy of its outputs or predictions over time is said to have learned to perform that task.
"[13] Types of supervised learning algorithms include active learning, classification and regression."
"[40] Classification algorithms are used when the outputs are restricted to a limited set of values, and regression algorithms are used when the outputs may have any numerical value within a range."
"As an example, for a classification algorithm that filters emails, the input would be an incoming email, and the output would be the name of the folder in which to file the email."
"Similarity learning is an area of supervised machine learning closely related to regression and classification, but the goal is to learn from examples using a similarity function that measures how similar or related two objects are."
"It has applications in ranking, recommendation systems, visual identity tracking, face verification, and speaker verification."
"Unsupervised learning algorithms take a set of data that contains only inputs, and find structure in the data, like grouping or clustering of data points."
"The algorithms, therefore, learn from test data that has not been labeled, classified or categorized."
"Instead of responding to feedback, unsupervised learning algorithms identify commonalities in the data and react based on the presence or absence of such commonalities in each new piece of data."
"A central application of unsupervised learning is in the field of density estimation in statistics, such as finding the probability density function."
[41] Though unsupervised learning encompasses other domains involving summarizing and explaining data features.
"Cluster analysis is the assignment of a set of observations into subsets (called clusters) so that observations within the same cluster are similar according to one or more predesignated criteria, while observations drawn from different clusters are dissimilar."
"Different clustering techniques make different assumptions on the structure of the data, often defined by some similarity metric and evaluated, for example, by internal compactness, or the similarity between members of the same cluster, and separation, the difference between clusters."
Other methods are based on estimated density and graph connectivity.
Semi-supervised learning falls between unsupervised learning (without any labeled training data) and supervised learning (with completely labeled training data).
"Some of the training examples are missing training labels,  yet many machine-learning researchers have found that unlabeled data, when used in conjunction with a small amount of labeled data, can produce a considerable improvement in learning accuracy."
"In weakly supervised learning, the training labels are noisy, limited, or imprecise; however, these labels are often cheaper to obtain, resulting in larger effective training sets."
[42] Reinforcement learning is an area of machine learning concerned with how software agents ought to take actions in an environment so as to maximize some notion of cumulative reward.
"Due to its generality, the field is studied in many other disciplines, such as game theory, control theory, operations research, information theory, simulation-based optimization, multi-agent systems, swarm intelligence, statistics and genetic algorithms."
"In machine learning, the environment is typically represented as a Markov decision process (MDP)."
Many reinforcement learning algorithms use dynamic programming techniques.
"[43] Reinforcement learning algorithms do not assume knowledge of an exact mathematical model of the MDP, and are used when exact models are infeasible."
Reinforcement learning algorithms are used in autonomous vehicles or in learning to play a game against a human opponent.
Self-learning as a machine learning paradigm was introduced in 1982 along with a neural network capable of self-learning named crossbar adaptive array (CAA).
[44] It is a learning with no external rewards and no external teacher advice.
"The CAA self-learning algorithm computes, in a crossbar fashion, both decisions about actions and emotions (feelings) about consequence situations."
The system is driven by the interaction between cognition and emotion.
"[45]
The self-learning algorithm updates a memory matrix W =||w(a,s)|| such that in each iteration executes the following machine learning routine: It is a system with only one input, situation s, and only one output, action (or behavior) a."
There is neither a separate reinforcement input nor an advice input from the environment.
The backpropagated value (secondary reinforcement) is the emotion toward the consequence situation.
"The CAA exists in two environments, one is the behavioral environment where it behaves, and the other is the genetic environment, wherefrom it initially and only once receives initial emotions about situations to be encountered in the behavioral environment."
"After receiving the genome (species) vector from the genetic environment, the CAA learns a goal-seeking behavior, in an environment that contains both desirable and undesirable situations."
[46] Several learning algorithms aim at discovering better representations of the inputs provided during training.
[47] Classic examples include principal components analysis and cluster analysis.
"Feature learning algorithms, also called representation learning algorithms, often attempt to preserve the information in their input but also transform it in a way that makes it useful, often as a pre-processing step before performing classification or predictions."
"This technique allows reconstruction of the inputs coming from the unknown data-generating distribution, while not being necessarily faithful to configurations that are implausible under that distribution."
"This replaces manual feature engineering, and allows a machine to both learn the features and use them to perform a specific task."
Feature learning can be either supervised or unsupervised.
"In supervised feature learning, features are learned using labeled input data."
"Examples include artificial neural networks, multilayer perceptrons, and supervised dictionary learning."
"In unsupervised feature learning, features are learned with unlabeled input data."
"Examples include dictionary learning, independent component analysis, autoencoders, matrix factorization[48] and various forms of clustering."
[49][50][51] Manifold learning algorithms attempt to do so under the constraint that the learned representation is low-dimensional.
"Sparse coding algorithms attempt to do so under the constraint that the learned representation is sparse, meaning that the mathematical model has many zeros."
"Multilinear subspace learning algorithms aim to learn low-dimensional representations directly from tensor representations for multidimensional data, without reshaping them into higher-dimensional vectors."
"[52] Deep learning algorithms discover multiple levels of representation, or a hierarchy of features, with higher-level, more abstract features defined in terms of (or generating) lower-level features."
It has been argued that an intelligent machine is one that learns a representation that disentangles the underlying factors of variation that explain the observed data.
[53] Feature learning is motivated by the fact that machine learning tasks such as classification often require input that is mathematically and computationally convenient to process.
"However, real-world data such as images, video, and sensory data has not yielded to attempts to algorithmically define specific features."
"An alternative is to discover such features or representations thorough examination, without relying on explicit algorithms."
"Sparse dictionary learning is a feature learning method where a training example is represented as a linear combination of basis functions, and is assumed to be a sparse matrix."
The method is strongly NP-hard and difficult to solve approximately.
[54] A popular heuristic method for sparse dictionary learning is the K-SVD algorithm.
Sparse dictionary learning has been applied in several contexts.
"In classification, the problem is to determine the class to which a previously unseen training example belongs."
"For a dictionary where each class has already been built, a new training example is associated with the class that is best sparsely represented by the corresponding dictionary."
Sparse dictionary learning has also been applied in image de-noising.
"The key idea is that a clean image patch can be sparsely represented by an image dictionary, but the noise cannot."
"[55] In data mining, anomaly detection, also known as outlier detection, is the identification of rare items, events or observations which raise suspicions by differing significantly from the majority of the data."
"[56] Typically, the anomalous items represent an issue such as bank fraud, a structural defect, medical problems or errors in a text."
"Anomalies are referred to as outliers, novelties, noise, deviations and exceptions."
"[57] In particular, in the context of abuse and network intrusion detection, the interesting objects are often not rare objects, but unexpected bursts of inactivity."
"This pattern does not adhere to the common statistical definition of an outlier as a rare object, and many outlier detection methods (in particular, unsupervised algorithms) will fail on such data unless it has been aggregated appropriately."
"Instead, a cluster analysis algorithm may be able to detect the micro-clusters formed by these patterns."
[58] Three broad categories of anomaly detection techniques exist.
"[59] Unsupervised anomaly detection techniques detect anomalies in an unlabeled test data set under the assumption that the majority of the instances in the data set are normal, by looking for instances that seem to fit least to the remainder of the data set."
"Supervised anomaly detection techniques require a data set that has been labeled as ""normal"" and ""abnormal"" and involves training a classifier (the key difference to many other statistical classification problems is the inherently unbalanced nature of outlier detection)."
Semi-supervised anomaly detection techniques construct a model representing normal behavior from a given normal training data set and then test the likelihood of a test instance to be generated by the model.
"In developmental robotics, robot learning algorithms generate their own sequences of learning experiences, also known as a curriculum, to cumulatively acquire new skills through self-guided exploration and social interaction with humans."
"These robots use guidance mechanisms such as active learning, maturation, motor synergies and imitation."
Association rule learning is a rule-based machine learning method for discovering relationships between variables in large databases.
"It is intended to identify strong rules discovered in databases using some measure of ""interestingness""."
"[60] Rule-based machine learning is a general term for any machine learning method that identifies, learns, or evolves ""rules"" to store, manipulate or apply knowledge."
The defining characteristic of a rule-based machine learning algorithm is the identification and utilization of a set of relational rules that collectively represent the knowledge captured by the system.
This is in contrast to other machine learning algorithms that commonly identify a singular model that can be universally applied to any instance in order to make a prediction.
"[61] Rule-based machine learning approaches include learning classifier systems, association rule learning, and artificial immune systems."
"Based on the concept of strong rules, Rakesh Agrawal, Tomasz Imieliński and Arun Swami introduced association rules for discovering regularities between products in large-scale transaction data recorded by point-of-sale (POS) systems in supermarkets."
"[62] For example, the rule 



{

o
n
i
o
n
s
,
p
o
t
a
t
o
e
s

}
⇒
{

b
u
r
g
e
r

}


{\displaystyle \{\mathrm {onions,potatoes} \}\Rightarrow \{\mathrm {burger} \}}

 found in the sales data of a supermarket would indicate that if a customer buys onions and potatoes together, they are likely to also buy hamburger meat."
Such information can be used as the basis for decisions about marketing activities such as promotional pricing or product placements.
"In addition to market basket analysis, association rules are employed today in application areas including Web usage mining, intrusion detection, continuous production, and bioinformatics."
"In contrast with sequence mining, association rule learning typically does not consider the order of items either within a transaction or across transactions."
"Learning classifier systems (LCS) are a family of rule-based machine learning algorithms that combine a discovery component, typically a genetic algorithm, with a learning component, performing either supervised learning, reinforcement learning, or unsupervised learning."
They seek to identify a set of context-dependent rules that collectively store and apply knowledge in a piecewise manner in order to make predictions.
"[63] Inductive logic programming (ILP) is an approach to rule-learning using logic programming as a uniform representation for input examples, background knowledge, and hypotheses."
"Given an encoding of the known background knowledge and a set of examples represented as a logical database of facts, an ILP system will derive a hypothesized logic program that entails all positive and no negative examples."
"Inductive programming is a related field that considers any kind of programming language for representing hypotheses (and not only logic programming), such as functional programs."
Inductive logic programming is particularly useful in bioinformatics and natural language processing.
Gordon Plotkin and Ehud Shapiro laid the initial theoretical foundation for inductive machine learning in a logical setting.
[64][65][66] Shapiro built their first implementation (Model Inference System) in 1981: a Prolog program that inductively inferred logic programs from positive and negative examples.
"[67] The term inductive here refers to philosophical induction, suggesting a theory to explain observed facts, rather than mathematical induction, proving a property for all members of a well-ordered set."
"Performing machine learning involves creating a model, which is trained on some training data and then can process additional data to make predictions."
Various types of models have been used and researched for machine learning systems.
"Artificial neural networks (ANNs), or connectionist systems, are computing systems vaguely inspired by the biological neural networks that constitute animal brains."
"Such systems ""learn"" to perform tasks by considering examples, generally without being programmed with any task-specific rules."
"An ANN is a model based on a collection of connected units or nodes called ""artificial neurons"", which loosely model the neurons in a biological brain."
"Each connection, like the synapses in a biological brain, can transmit information, a ""signal"", from one artificial neuron to another."
An artificial neuron that receives a signal can process it and then signal additional artificial neurons connected to it.
"In common ANN implementations, the signal at a connection between artificial neurons is a real number, and the output of each artificial neuron is computed by some non-linear function of the sum of its inputs."
"The connections between artificial neurons are called ""edges""."
Artificial neurons and edges typically have a weight that adjusts as learning proceeds.
The weight increases or decreases the strength of the signal at a connection.
Artificial neurons may have a threshold such that the signal is only sent if the aggregate signal crosses that threshold.
"Typically, artificial neurons are aggregated into layers."
Different layers may perform different kinds of transformations on their inputs.
"Signals travel from the first layer (the input layer) to the last layer (the output layer), possibly after traversing the layers multiple times."
The original goal of the ANN approach was to solve problems in the same way that a human brain would.
"However, over time, attention moved to performing specific tasks, leading to deviations from biology."
"Artificial neural networks have been used on a variety of tasks, including computer vision, speech recognition, machine translation, social network filtering, playing board and video games and medical diagnosis."
Deep learning consists of multiple hidden layers in an artificial neural network.
This approach tries to model the way the human brain processes light and sound into vision and hearing.
Some successful applications of deep learning are computer vision and speech recognition.
[68] Decision tree learning uses a decision tree as a predictive model to go from observations about an item (represented in the branches) to conclusions about the item's target value (represented in the leaves).
"It is one of the predictive modeling approaches used in statistics, data mining, and machine learning."
"Tree models where the target variable can take a discrete set of values are called classification trees; in these tree structures, leaves represent class labels and branches represent conjunctions of features that lead to those class labels."
Decision trees where the target variable can take continuous values (typically real numbers) are called regression trees.
"In decision analysis, a decision tree can be used to visually and explicitly represent decisions and decision making."
"In data mining, a decision tree describes data, but the resulting classification tree can be an input for decision making."
"Support vector machines (SVMs), also known as support vector networks, are a set of related supervised learning methods used for classification and regression."
"Given a set of training examples, each marked as belonging to one of two categories, an SVM training algorithm builds a model that predicts whether a new example falls into one category or the other."
"[69]  An SVM training algorithm is a non-probabilistic, binary, linear classifier, although methods such as Platt scaling exist to use SVM in a probabilistic classification setting."
"In addition to performing linear classification, SVMs can efficiently perform a non-linear classification using what is called the kernel trick, implicitly mapping their inputs into high-dimensional feature spaces."
Regression analysis encompasses a large variety of statistical methods to estimate the relationship between input variables and their associated features.
"Its most common form is linear regression, where a single line is drawn to best fit the given data according to a mathematical criterion such as ordinary least squares."
"The latter is often extended by regularization (mathematics) methods to mitigate overfitting and bias, as in ridge regression."
"When dealing with non-linear problems, go-to models include polynomial regression (for example, used for trendline fitting in Microsoft Excel[70]), logistic regression (often used in statistical classification) or even kernel regression, which introduces non-linearity by taking advantage of the kernel trick to implicitly map input variables to higher-dimensional space."
"A Bayesian network, belief network, or directed acyclic graphical model is a probabilistic graphical model that represents a set of random variables and their conditional independence with a directed acyclic graph (DAG)."
"For example, a Bayesian network could represent the probabilistic relationships between diseases and symptoms."
"Given symptoms, the network can be used to compute the probabilities of the presence of various diseases."
Efficient algorithms exist that perform inference and learning.
"Bayesian networks that model sequences of variables, like speech signals or protein sequences, are called dynamic Bayesian networks."
Generalizations of Bayesian networks that can represent and solve decision problems under uncertainty are called influence diagrams.
"A genetic algorithm (GA) is a search algorithm and heuristic technique that mimics the process of natural selection, using methods such as mutation and crossover to generate new genotypes in the hope of finding good solutions to a given problem."
"In machine learning, genetic algorithms were used in the 1980s and 1990s."
"[71][72] Conversely, machine learning techniques have been used to improve the performance of genetic and evolutionary algorithms."
"[73] Usually, machine learning models require a lot of data in order for them to perform well."
"Usually, when training a machine learning model, one needs to collect a large, representative sample of data from a training set."
"Data from the training set can be as varied as a corpus of text, a collection of images, and data collected from individual users of a service."
Overfitting is something to watch out for when training a machine learning model.
Trained models derived from biased data can result in skewed or undesired predictions.
Algorithmic bias is a potential result from data not fully prepared for training.
"Federated learning is an adapted form of distributed artificial intelligence to training machine learning models that decentralizes the training process, allowing for users' privacy to be maintained by not needing to send their data to a centralized server."
This also increases efficiency by decentralizing the training process to many devices.
"For example, Gboard uses federated machine learning to train search query prediction models on users' mobile phones without having to send individual searches back to Google."
"[74] There are many applications for machine learning, including: In 2006, the media-services provider Netflix held the first ""Netflix Prize"" competition to find a program to better predict user preferences and improve the accuracy of its existing Cinematch movie recommendation algorithm by at least 10%."
A joint team made up of researchers from AT&T Labs-Research in collaboration with the teams Big Chaos and Pragmatic Theory built an ensemble model to win the Grand Prize in 2009 for $1 million.
"[76] Shortly after the prize was awarded, Netflix realized that viewers' ratings were not the best indicators of their viewing patterns (""everything is a recommendation"") and they changed their recommendation engine accordingly."
[77] In 2010 The Wall Street Journal wrote about the firm Rebellion Research and their use of machine learning to predict the financial crisis.
"[78] In 2012, co-founder of Sun Microsystems, Vinod Khosla, predicted that 80% of medical doctors' jobs would be lost in the next two decades to automated machine learning medical diagnostic software."
"[79] In 2014, it was reported that a machine learning algorithm had been applied in the field of art history to study fine art paintings and that it may have revealed previously unrecognized influences among artists."
[80] In 2019 Springer Nature published the first research book created using machine learning.
"[81] Although machine learning has been transformative in some fields, machine-learning programs often fail to deliver expected results."
"[82][83][84] Reasons for this are numerous: lack of (suitable) data, lack of access to the data, data bias, privacy problems, badly chosen tasks and algorithms, wrong tools and people, lack of resources, and evaluation problems."
"[85] In 2018, a self-driving car from Uber failed to detect a pedestrian, who was killed after a collision."
[86] Attempts to use machine learning in healthcare with the IBM Watson system failed to deliver even after years of time and billions of dollars invested.
[87][88] Machine learning has been used as a strategy to update the evidence related to systematic review and increased reviewer burden related to the growth of biomedical literature.
"While it has improved with training sets, it has not yet developed sufficiently to reduce the workload burden without limiting the necessary sensitivity for the findings research themselves."
[89] Machine learning approaches in particular can suffer from different data biases.
A machine learning system trained on current customers only may not be able to predict the needs of new customer groups that are not represented in the training data.
